<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89509-0022 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.5-09-89.f2.A1021</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 88 / Tuesday, May 9, 1989 / Rulesand Regulations <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">National Highway Traffic Safety Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">49 CFR Part 571 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. 85-15; Notice 8] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 2127-AC53 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards; Lamps, Reflective Devices,and Associated Equipment </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>National Highway Traffic Safety Administration (NHTSA),DOT.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This notice amends the headlighting requirements of StandardNo. 108 by deleting certain external dimensions for sealed beam headlamps,lifetime requirements for sealed beam headlamps and standardized replaceablelight sources, photometric requirements for headlamps designed to conformto SAE J579a, and certain durability requirements for headlamps. A newcategory is added, headlamps without dimensional requirements. Two newsizes of sealed beam headlamps petitioned for by General Motors Corporationand GTE Sylvania are the first systems eligible for inclusion in this category,to be known as ``integral beam headlamps.'' An on-vehicle mechanical aimalternative to existing off-vehicle mechanical aim is also adopted. Theeffect of these amendments is to eliminate design restrictions not necessaryfor safety, resulting in a more performance oriented standard, as requiredby the National Traffic and Motor Vehicle Safety Act. The amendments shouldencourage innovation in headlighting systems.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>The effective date of the rule is June 8, 1989,except for paragraphs S7.2 and S7.6(i) which are effective December 1,1989. The approval of the Director of the Federal Register for certainpublications incorporated by reference is effective June 8, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Petitions for reconsideration of the rule should referto the docket number and notice and be submitted to: Administrator, NationalHighway and Traffic Safety Administration, 400 Seventh Street SW., Washington,DC 20590.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Richard Van Iderstine, Officeof Rulemaking, NHTSA, (202-366-5280).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>The publication of this final rulecompletes some aspects of rulemaking initiated on October 22, 1985, whenNHTSA published a notice of Request for Comments that concentrated on certainareas of the headlighting requirements of Standard No. 108 (50 FR 42735,with extension of comment time at 51 FR 1542 and correction at 51 FR 2536).Subsequently, a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking responding to the commentssubmitted on the October 1985 request was published on December 29, 1987(52 FR 49038), presenting NHTSA's recommendations for short term simplificationof the headlighting requirements of Motor Vehicle Safety Standard No. 108.<ITAG tagnum="84">I. Photometric Performance </ITAG>The initial headlighting photometric requirements of Standard No. 108,effective January 1, 1968, were those of SAE Standard J579a, August 1965.They remained the sole photometrics permissible for motor vehicles otherthan motorcycles until 1978 when the standard was amended to allow optionalcompliance with the photometrics of SAE Standard J579c, December 1974 (nowDecember 1978). The principal difference between the two SAE requirementsis the allowance of up to 100% more total candela on the upper beam ofthe J579c lamps. Also, the lower beam of a J579c lamp is aimed more tothe left and has a higher intensity, and the upper beam is aimed higher.These differences proved of such benefit and interest to the consumer that,by the early 1980's, virtually all original equipment headlamps were designedto conform to J579c; as a result, there is very little market today foreven replacement headlamps designed to conform to J579a. As NHTSA commentedin its 1985 notice, ``The existence of three photometric requirements,one of which is for all practical purposes nearly obsolete, promotes unnecessaryconfusion and serves no apparent safety purposes.'' (50 FR 42739). Theagency therefore proposed the elimination of SAE J579a from Standard No.108 in December 1987. This proposal was supported by virtually all commenters,and Standard No. 108 is being amended to delete SAE J579a. <ITAG tagnum="84">II. Elimination of Certain Dimensional Specifications </ITAG>From its beginning, Standard No. 108 has incorporated by reference detailedSAE drawings prescribing dimensions for most types of sealed beam headlamps.More recently, in the absence of SAE references, detailed drawings havebeen directly incorporated into the Standard. These dimensions relate tothe fit of the lamp into the housing, the size and shape of the lamp andretaining rings, seating plane lugs, electrical prongs, and headlamp mountingring notches. The primary rationale for their incorporation has been toensure compatibility between original and replacement equipment, so thatproper replacement equipment shall be readily available, shall fit onlyin the proper receptacle to assure a photometrically correct system, andshall perform with the equivalence of the original lighting equipment.NHTSA tentatively concluded that most dimensional specifications for newtypes of non-standardized headlighting systems were not necessary for motorvehicle safety. Accordingly in December 1987, NHTSA proposed two meansfor dealing with headlamp dimensions. First, for existing standardizedsealed beam headlighting systems, the agency proposed deleting dimensionsthat are not necessary for interchangeability. The agency decided thatrequirements necessary for interchangeability should be retained for existingsealed beam systems in order to ensure that replacement headlamps manufacturedafter the effective date of the final rule will in fact fit. Consequently,the agency proposed incorporating by reference SAE Standard J1383 APR85<T3>``Performance Requirements for Motor Vehicle Headlamps''</T3> whichretains only those dimensional requirements necessary for interchangeabilityof Type A through Type E headlamps, and deleting the SAE standards thatare incorporated by reference in Tables I and III of Standard No. 108 whichhave been the source of excess dimensional requirements. Commenters generallyagreed with these deletions and the incorporation of J1383, and StandardNo. 108 has been amended accordingly. However, dimensions for Types F,G, and H headlamps are not included in J1383, and remain unchanged fromthose presently in Standard No. 108.Additionally, as part of its analysis of issues relating to dimensions,NHTSA proposed a new category of headlighting system, to be known as an``integral beam headlighting system.'' The integral beam headlamp is notrequired to have industry or Federally standardized dimensions, yet issimilar in concept to existing sealed beam headlighting systems. The integralbeam headlamp is defined as incorporating a lens, reflector and light sourcein an indivisible unit, but is not necessarily ``sealed'' since this isa design-related aspect. All new headlamp systems that do not have replaceablebulbs will be treated as integral beam systems as of the amendment of StandardNo. 108.Comments supported the proposal and it has been adopted. NHTSA sought commentson the issue of availability of replacement parts of new systems. Somecommenters expressed concern about the availability of replacement partsfor dimensionally unregulated headlamps, but provided no actual indicationthat such has occurred in practice after a short time has passed followingintroduction of new lamps or light sources. The agency believes that experiencein practice should not differ from that of replaceable bulb headlamps,whose dimensions are also unregulated, and where no problem of availabilityhas been reported.Headlamps that will be able to take advantage of the new integral beamcategory are a sealed beam system of four 55andmultiply;135 mm headlampspetitioned for by General Motors Corporation, and a system developed byGTE Sylvania of eight miniature headlamps, which Sylvania refers to as``Multi-beam''. The adoption of this rule constitutes the granting of thepetition by Sylvania (the GM petition was previously granted).Essentially, the design of the size and shape of an integral beam headlightingsystem is left to the vehicle or lighting manufacturer. The photometricperformance required of integral beam headlighting systems is that prescribedby either SAE J579c (using either two or four headlamps per system), orType F photometry of Figure 15 or 17 of Standard No. 108 (using two ormore headlamps per system). The environmental performance required of thissystem is that presently required of existing replaceable bulb headlightingsystems. However if the lamp is of a ``sealed'' design, the manufactureris relieved of certifying compliance to certain performance requirementsthat do not apply to sealed lamps.For aim retention upon lamp replacement, the integral beam headlightingwill have a common aiming and mounting plane, which will result in greatlyreduced aiming error upon headlamp replacement. It will perform in muchthe same manner as the present standardized replaceable light source inthat the lamp may be replaced with little effect on headlamp aim. Thiscommon aiming and mounting plane is also presently specified for the mostrecently permitted sealed beam headlighting systems, Types F, G, and H.To ensure mechanical aimability, the integral beam systems will have eitheraiming pads for use with existing off-vehicle mechanical aimers, or fiducialmarks with an integral on-vehicle aiming and mounting mechanism. The useof fiducial marks (as an option to present lens-mounted aiming pads) permitsgreater headlamp styling freedom, and can potentially provide better aimretention depending on the manufacturers' actual designs. The specificationfor fiducial marks is a recognition that they are acceptable substitutesfor the aiming pads that are presently found on the lenses of headlampsand are used for the purpose of determining photometric conformance toStandard No. 108, and for mechanical aiming purposes. As discussed in SectionV below, the agency has adopted this requirement for either aiming padsor fiducial marks for all new headlighting system designs of both integralbeam and replaceable bulb types.Because NHTSA does not specify the dimensions of integral beam headlamps,they are not required to be standardized. They will, however, have to meetall headlamp performance requirements such as photometry, environmentaldegradation, and aimability. Under the rule, a manufacturer seeking tointroduce a new integral beam system can do so without the necessity ofpetitioning for an amendment of Standard No. 108.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. Life Expectancy of Headlamps </ITAG>Standard No. 108 at present is regulatorily inconsistent, specifying averagedesign life requirements for its standardized replaceable light sources,and two of its sealed beam systems, but not for the remaining six sealedbeam systems designed to conform to SAE J579c. For regulatory consistency,NHTSA noted in the NPRM that the standard should either extend averagedesign life requirements to all headlighting systems, or delete them forthose presently covered. As the agency noted in its October 1985 notice,other options are to delete longevity requirements but require manufacturersto rate life expectancy on the bulb package, to require that the headlamplast the life of the vehicle, and to retain the existing requirements.The agency believes that the competitive forces of the marketplace willencourage manufacturers to maintain, or improve, the life-expectancy oflight sources. Therefore the agency proposed that all longevity requirementsbe deleted. However, because life of a light source has an influence onthe total number of lamp outages during the life of a vehicle, thus possiblysome influence on crash risk as well, NHTSA sought specific comments onwhether or not the absence of an average design life requirement wouldhave a discernible effect on the actual life of light sources in headlightingsystems. Because filament life and lumen output (and hence photometricperformance) are inversely related, NHTSA envisions that trade-offs couldoccur, with performance gains for lesser lamp life. With the apparent needof vehicle manufacturers for headlamps with minimum vertical height, low-profilelamps may have to sacrifice some longevity in order to achieve the requiredminimum photometric specifications. These trade offs have cost, quality,and performance effects on headlighting systems, their manufacturers, andtheir users. Therefore, NHTSA solicited comment on the proposed deletionof average design life requirements in order to understand more completelyhow these trade offs may affect safety.Of the 23 comments on this issue, 14 opposed deletion of design life requirements.The basis for the opposition was the potential for the decrease in lifeexpectancy of headlamps. The agency is concerned about this issue but inthe absence of proof that this will occur finds this a speculative argment.Those headlamps manufactured today without a Federal design life requirementappear to have a life equivalent to those with a required average designlife. Therefore, the majority of the comments notwithstanding, NHTSA hasdecided to adopt the proposed deletion.<ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Durability</ITAG>As a further simplification of headlighting requirements relating to durabilityand aim retention, NHTSA proposed deletion of certain portions of SAE J580DEC86 ``Sealed Beam Headlamp Assembly,'' which were adopted in the initialstandard (SAE J580a, June 1966), and which may no longer be necessary forsafety. These deletions included paragraphs 3.3 (vibration test), 6.1.3(test for 20 cycles of full range aim adjustment), 6.3.1 (test for 20 cyclesof retaining ring removal and installation), 6.2 and subparagraphs and6.5 and subparagraphs (the inward force test and torque deflection test,respectively, except for all headlamps using externally applied mechanicalaimers).Durability tests exercise a headlighting system's ability to withstandthe anticipated environment in service while still providing acceptableroadway illumination. The deletions for 20-cycle aim range and retainingring installation were deemed to be of little significance to safety. Thedeletion of inward force and torque deflection is appropriate for headlightingsystems which do not use externally applied aimers, since these tests areintended to show resistance to the effects of the weight and applicationof external aimers. North American Philips Lighting Corporation was infavor of retaining the inward force and force deflection tests, not onlyfor guarding against the misaim of headlamps from the force of headlampaimers, but also to ensure against misaim if force is applied against theheadlamp when the vehicle is pushed by hand. NHTSA believes that vehiclemanufacturers will be cautious enough to design vehicles to withstand thelikelihood of misaim in this event, and, considering the deletion appropriateonly for headlamps which do not have aiming pads for external mechanicalaimers, has adopted the proposed modification of applicability of inwardforce and torque deflection tests. Commenters generally supported the proposeddeletions for aim range and retaining ring installation; however, the Stateof Minnesota stated its belief that some form of test is necessary to assurethat the lamps can be reaimed throughout their life and survive in realworld conditions. The agency agrees, but notes that the tests proposedfor deletion do not appear to prevent long term deterioration of aimability.Little relevant information on this issue was presented by any other commenter,and consequently they are being deleted as proposed.As NHTSA noted in the NPRM's preamble, the proposal for deletion of thevibration test was not as straightforward, and the comments received weremixed. While vibration testing is intended to anticipate such on-vehiclevibration effects as broken or cracked lenses, reflectors, light sourcemountings or aim hardware, NHTSA was of the opinion that the existing vibrationprocedure may not accurately test the lamp system for these adverse effects.Despite this, the present test procedure has produced signal lamp failuresthat were also found in vehicles-in-use. Since this procedure currentlyapplies to all lighting devices, and not just headlighting systems, NHTSAnoted that it was difficult to justify deletion for headlamps only. However,no headlamp vibration test failures have been found to date (although Fordin its petition for rulemaking (now pending) to adopt the 9007 as a standardizedreplaceable light source implied that the HB1 light source may experienceburnout from vibration). Consequently, it is currently not known whetherthere is a safety benefit from vibration testing of headlighting systems.The agency requested comment on deletion or development of a more correlatedvibration performance specification. Ford argued that there is no reasonto retain the vibration test. GTE/Sylvania recommended development of avibration test more correlated to safety. Saab suggested adoption of SAEJ575 for a vibration test, while Stanley Electric thought SAE J1383 wouldbe better, since it was specifically written for headlamps. The commentsvaried widely, and NHTSA has decided to retain the current requirementwith which the industry is familiar. The agency urges manufacturers towork toward development of a more correlated vibration performance specification.Two other durability tests concerned NHTSA, the Temperature Cycle Test(numbered S8.6.1 in the Proposal's revised format), and the Impact Test(S8.8). Presently these remain as part of the requirements by headlightingsystems since the purpose of these requirements continues to be a valid.However, NHTSA is concerned that the requirements may not fully reflectthe real world. The temperature range may be too small in view of the ambientenvironmental temperatures that occur in the United States and in today'shigh temperature engine compartments. The impact energy also appears toolow to simulate accurately the actual stone damage that can occur. NHTSAsought comment on these procedures, and if appropriate, a more correlatedset of procedures or performance requirements. Few commented on the temperaturetest, but Stanley Electric recommended even higher performances. It alsosupported deletion of the impact test, as did many other commenters. Itthought that it provided little in terms of safety, given the typical impactresistance of plastic lenses. The agency has decided to retain the temperaturetest as written, but will consider proposing to amend the procedure ina future rulemaking proceeding. Also, in a companion notice under preparationon the longer term aspects of headlighting simplification, the agency willformally propose deletion of the impact test.<ITAG tagnum="84">V. Headlamp Aimability and Aim</ITAG>A further aspect of Standard No. 108 to which the agency turned its attentionin the NPRM was headlamp aimability. Currently, headlamps must be capableof mechanical aim using equipment specified by SAE J602. However, withthe proliferation in sizes and shapes of headlighting systems permissibleunder Standard No. 108 since 1983 has come a corresponding proliferationin adapters necessary for mechanical aimers to perform their purpose. Thishas created confusion, difficulty, and higher potential for aiming error.The agency therefore developed a general aiming performance requirementthat would permit headlamps to be aimed by means other than use of existingmechanical aimers and lens-mounted aiming pads if the new methods couldperform as well as existing mechanical aimers, and if no excessive off-vehicleequipment would be required. One example of a new method for vertical aiminspection would be a spirit level incorporated in the headlamp housingwhich, when the vehicle attitude was horizontal and the air bubble wascentered properly, would indicate proper vertical aim.Under the proposal, and adopted in the final rule, each headlamp will havefiducial marks (or aiming pads if its manufacturer chose to retain itsexisting design) for the purpose of determining the reference axis to beused for photometric performance testing; such marks will also be the aimingreference when the headlamp is installed on the vehicle. The headlamp isthen installed in the vehicle using a mounting/aiming mechanism incorporatingvertical and horizontal aiming adjustments and optional aiming references.It is aimable using either conventional off-vehicle mechanical aimers or,should the manufacturer so decide, by optional on-vehicle aimers whichuse only a floor slope measurement as the off-vehicle reference. The on-vehicleaiming mechanism is a termed a ``vehicle headlamp aiming device'', or ``VHAD''.Vehicle manufacturers commenting on the subject were unanimously in favorof the concept of a vehicle based aiming performance requirement. However,many felt that the requirement proposed was overly stringent and unnecessaryfor safety. Lamp manufacturers were generally agreeable to the proposalbut also had recommendations for modifications to the proposal.The agency disagrees that the VHAD proposal is restrictive. The proposalwas based specifically on the performance of the mechanical headlamp aimingdevice performance currently specified in SAE Standard J602 OCT80 ``HeadlampAiming Device for Mechanically Aimable Sealed Beam Headlamp Units''. Allexisting headlamp designs allowed by Standard No. 108 have been requiredto be aimable with aiming devices meeting the SAE standard. In order forthe present level of safety to be maintained, any new mechanical aimingmethod must have at least the accuracy of the method presently in use.Therefore, the agency is adopting the requirements based on J602 performanceas proposed. The proposal for aiming instructions of the VHAD was not specificin detail in an attempt to provide the widest latitude for manufacturers.The actual proposed text of the VHAD has been rewritten in part to clarifythe agency's intent.Under the proposal, headlamp aim accuracy was to be verified upon completionof the manufacture of the vehicle. Many manufacturers claimed that theycould not meet it under those circumstances. General Motors presented qualityassurance data showing that most of its production can meet the +/^ 4 inchhorizontal and vertical performance that is required in most States, butnot the tighter aim tolerance that was proposed. Ford claimed that theproposed factory aiming requirement cannot be achieved by today's state-of-the-artequipment. NHTSA appreciates that between the time headlamps are aimedon a vehicle assembly line and when again checked by quality assuranceinspectors, the vehicle could have settled, causing errors in aiming. Uponreflection, the proposed requirement appears impracticable because of itstighter aim tolerance, and it has not been adopted.Another issue of concern to vehicle manufacturers was the transfer of rangeof aim adjustment from the performance of a headlighting system in a laboratoryto the system as installed on a vehicle. NHTSA firmly believes that aimingrange performance met under test conditions must be replicated when a headlightingsystem is used in real world conditions, and the NPRM was meant to clarifyNHTSA's intent. The benefit to safety of such a requirement is that headlampscould continue to be aimable at the extremes of changes in vehicle attitude.Vehicle manufacturers are concerned that a large adjustment range willrequire a correspondingly large opening surrounding the headlamp; the smallerthe adjustment range, the smaller the opening. NHTSA has modified the aimrange to accommodate these concerns.In countries other than the United States, the opening surrounding thelamp has been eliminated by fixing the headlamp housing and lens to thecar body and by providing a movable reflector inside the headlamp housingto accommodate aiming the headlamp's beam. Nissan commented that the on-vehicleaimability performance proposal would allow headlamps with movable reflectors,an approach desirable from its standpoint. NHTSA agrees that this is true,provided that headlamps of this design comply with the photometric performancerequirements with the lens in all possible positions relative to the positionof the reflector, as all headlamps under Standard No. 108 must. ParagraphS7.7.2.2 has been added to clarify this. Nissan questioned, however, whetherStandard No. 108 would permit replaceable bulb headlamps to have adjustablereflectors because the definition requires a bonded lens and reflectorassembly, and its interpretation is that the lens must always be bondeddirectly to the reflector. This is not always true. NHTSA does not interpretthe standard as prohibiting reflector assemblies with movable reflectorsbecause a replaceable bulb headlamp is defined in pertinent part as one``comprising a bonded lens and reflector <T3>assembly</T3>'' (emphasis added). The definition does not specify theportion of the assembly that must be bonded to the lens. The ``assembly''as currently used in the industry incorporates internal light shields,gear boxes for changing the direction of rotation of aiming screws thatare incorporated, and other hardware.However, with respect to the aim adjustment range that so concerned somecommenters, NHTSA believes that the original proposal may be modified withno detriment to safety. Under the proposal, the aim range required was(in pertinent part) from ``the greater of the following: +/^ 4 deg. V orthe full range of vehicle pitch * * *.'' The text now reads in pertinentpart ``+/^ 4 degrees vertical in the laboratory, and on the vehicle, notless than the full range of vehicle pitch.'' This modification resultsin performance essentially identical to that achieved on vehicles today,and is deemed proper for the on-vehicle aim range.As part of the proposal, NHTSA used the most recent SAE Standards and RecommendedPractices for reference. Many of these updated references include performanceor aspects not currently incorporated in Standard No. 108. Consequently,exceptions where necessary were stated in the NPRM so that the requirementsthat have been adopted are essentially identical to those which currentlyexist.Finally, as part of the revision of Standard No. 108, NHTSA is separatingthe Scope and Purpose sections in line with its practice in a majorityof the safety standards and reorganizing the various headlighting requirementsinto a new section S7 ``Headlighting Requirements''. Of necessity, theremaining sections of the standard have been renumbered.<ITAG tagnum="84">VI. Consumer Information</ITAG>Because of the increasing variety of headlamps available today and thosethat may result from the integral beam amendments, NHTSA proposed thatidentifying information, sufficient to ensure proper replacement, be madeavailable to the consumer at the time a vehicle was purchased. In response,Nissan suggested that the manufacturer's part number could be marked onoriginal and replacement headlamps, obviating the need for an amendmentto the consumer information regulations. NHTSA had already in essence proposedsuch a requirement when it proposed adoption of SAE J1383 which incorporatesequipment marking. Given that replacement headlamp light sources are standardizedfor performance and interchangeability, and that headlamp housings arenow designed to be vehicle-specific, the agency has decided that littlereason exists to require identification information in any location otherthan on the object itself. For those devices that are vehicle-specific,replacement parts should always be available at the appropriate dealership.For those items presently standardized by Standard No. 108, ready availabilityalready exists. Accordingly, NHTSA is not adopting the amendments proposedfor 49 CFR Part 575, but is specifying appropriate equipment marking.<ITAG tagnum="84">VII. Miscellaneous Amendments </ITAG>Certain minor amendments are necessary for full allowance of the new GMsmall rectangular headlamp system. The system generally meets the photometricsof present Figure 15 of Standard No. 108, except that the upper beam testpoint values at 2 1/2D-V and 2 1/2D-12R and 12L apply to the lower beamheadlamp and not to the upper beam headlamp, and the upper beam test pointvalue at 1 1/2D-9R and 9L is 1,000 candela (See S7.4(a)). Paragraph S5.5.8permits headlighting systems designed to conform with Figure 15 to be wiredso that the lower beam remains permanently activated when the upper beamis activated; this section is amended to require such an activation forheadlamps meeting the excepted photometrics of Figure 15. Similar accommodationsare made in paragraphs S7.4(d), S7.4(h), and the second sentence of S7.7.2.1.As noted previously, the amendments will allow a system of miniature headlamps,petitioned for by GTE Sylvania, in which two such lamps provide a singlebeam. Amendments of terminology appear required for implementation of theSylvania system. Where appropriate (for example, as in lens marking) theterm ``beam contributor'' is used in place of ``headlamp,'' because a singledevice provides only half of the beam. Clarifying amendments are also adopted. With respect to aiming pad location,NHTSA has said that it expected the aiming pad pattern to be located onthe lower beam part of a headlamp lens. However, there is no need for sucha requirement, and S7.7.5.1(d)(1) states that ``The aiming pads need notbe centered at the geometric center of the lens or on the optical axis.''Proposed S7.7.5.1(e) has been adopted with language intended to assurethat the locating plates and the aiming pads to which they will interfaceare compatible. Paragraph S7.7.5 has not been adopted exactly as proposed;it now addresses headlamp wipers. These are permitted for intergral beamheadlighting systems and replaceable bulb headlamps as long as the applicablephotometric performance can be met with the wiper stopped in any locationin front of the lens. Pursuant to a comment by Ford Motor Company thatthe standard should not restrict the VHAD to be solely an ``at the headlamp''indicator or adjustment (a headlamp system could be designed to be aimedfrom the driver's seat or by automatic means) paragraph S7.7.5.2(a)(iii)adds language that distinguishes between direct reading analog indicatorsand remote reading indicators. The following proposals have also been adopted, though not necessarilyunder the section numbers indicated in the NPRM: a new marking requirementfor the HB1 standardized replaceable light source, to assure proper identificationand for consistency with the marking requirements for HB3 and HB4 lightsources; a pressure sealing test requirement for the HB1 light source,to assure the intended sealing performance, and for consistency with HB3and HB4 light sources; and integral beam headlamps which do not have bothan integral mounting and aiming mechanism and a VHAD must incorporate commonor parallel mounting and aiming planes, intended to eliminate a major sourceof aiming error that occurs upon headlamp replacement. However, this proposal(proposed S7.4(j)) was design restrictive as written but as adopted hasbeen replaced with a more performance-oriented requirement that achievesthe same result: Any headlamp or beam contributor that does not have aVHAD as an integral and indivisible part of its housing shall meet a lampreplacement test, under which photometric performance must be met whenany correctly aimed and photometrically conforming lamp or beam contributoris removed from its mounting and aiming mechanism and replaced withoutreaim by another conforming lamp or beam contributor of the same type.<ITAG tagnum="84">VIII. Impacts </ITAG>NHTSA has considered this rule and has determined that it is not majorwithin the meaning of Executive Order 12291 ``Federal Regulation'' butis significant under Department of Transportation regulatory policies andprocedures. A Regulatory Evaluation (RE) has been prepared and placed inthe Docket. The amendments are intended to relieve a regulatory burdenunnecessary for safety by affording manufacturers greater flexibility inthe design of headlighting systems. This is likely to result in an increasein the number of types of headlamps on motor vehicles. An increase in thenumber of types of headlamps could affect to some degree the volume ofbusiness of some small gas or service stations that currently carry replacementheadlamps in stock, by causing them to carry only the most popular types.However, the inability to stock parts has been a developing trend, andmany stations have converted to a ``gas only'' operation and others orderparts from distributors on an ``as needed'' basis. NHTSA has analyzed this rule for the purposes of the National EnvironmentalPolicy Act. It is not anticipated that the rule will have a significanteffect upon the environment. The design and composition of headlamps arenot expected to change from those presently in production. However, shouldthis rulemaking result in headlamps or bulbs with a shorter life, therewill be a greater demand for replacement headlamps or bulbs and a correspondingincrease in materials necessary for their manufacture. This possibilityis speculative. Additionally, with the movement away from Federal regulation of dimensionsfor the interchangeability of headlamps, the only source of vehicle-specificreplacement headlamps may become the vehicle manufacturer and its authorizeddealers, although this possibility also is speculative. The agency has also considered the impacts of this rule in relation tothe Regulatory Flexibility Act. I certify that this rule will not havea significant economic impact upon a substantial number of small entities.Accordingly, no regulatory flexibility analysis has been prepared. Manufacturersof motor vehicles and headlamps, those affected by the proposal, are generallynot small businesses within the meaning of the Regulatory Flexibility Act.Finally, small organizations and governmental jurisdictions will not besignificantly affected since the price of new vehicles and replacementheadlamps should be minimally impacted by the substitution of one typeof headlighting system for another. The equipment marking requirements in this rule are considered to be informationcollection requirements, as that term is defined by the Office of Managementand Budget (OMB) in 5 CFR Part 1320. Accordingly, these requirements arebeing submitted to the OMB for its approval, pursuant to the requirementsof the Paperwork Reduction Act (44 U.S.C. 3501 <T3>et seq.</T3>). This action has been analyzed in accordance with the principles and criteriacontained in Executive Order 12612 ``Federalism'', and it has been determinedthat the final rule does not have sufficient federalism implications towarrant preparation of a federalism assessment. To the extent that a Statelaw covering the same aspect of performance as the rule is not identicalto it, it will be preempted, pursuant to the specific preemption provisionsof 15 U.S.C. 1392(d). However, the agency is not aware of any State lawsthat conflict with the rule. <ITAG tagnum="84">IX. Effective Dates </ITAG>Because of the need to relieve design restrictions and encourage innovation,it is hereby found for good cause shown that an effective date earlierthan 180 days after publication of the final rule is in the public interest,and the amendment is effective 30 days after its publication in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. However because the marking requirements ofparagraphs S7.2 and S7.6(i) are mandatory, by their terms those sectionsshall not become effective until December 1, 1989. Marking requirementscurrently in effect remain unchanged. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 49 CFR Part 571 </ITAG>Imports, Motor vehicle safety, Motor vehicles, Incorporation by reference.The engineer and lawyer primarily responsible for this rule are RichardVan Iderstine and Taylor Vinson respectively. In consideration of the foregoing, 49 CFR 571.108 Motor Vehicle SafetyStandard No. 108, ``Lamps, Reflective Devices, and Associated Equipment''is amended as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 571_[AMENDED] </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 571 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>15 U.S.C. 1392, 1401, 1403, 1407; delegation of authorityat 49 CFR 1.50, and 501.4</ITAG>2. The text of 49 CFR 571.108 (Paragraphs S1 through S8) is revised asfollows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 571.108 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard No. 108; Lamps, reflective devices, and associated equipment.</ITAG>S1. <T3>Scope. </T3>This standard specifies requirements for original and replacementlamps, reflective devices, and associated equipment. S2. <T3>Purpose. </T3>The purpose of this standard is to reduce traffic accidentsand deaths and injuries resulting from traffic accidents, by providingadequate illumination of the roadway, and by enhancing the conspicuityof motor vehicles on the public roads so that their presence is perceivedand their signals understood, both in daylight and in darkness or otherconditions of reduced visibility. S3. <T3>Application. </T3>This standard applies to passenger cars, multipurposepassenger vehicles, trucks, buses, trailers (except pole trailers and trailerconverter dollies), and motorcycles, and to lamps, reflective devices,and associated equipment for replacement of like equipment on vehiclesto which this standard applies. S4. <T3>Definitions. </T3> ``Aiming Reference Plane'' means a plane which is perpendicular to thelongitudinal axis of the vehicle and tangent to the forward most aimingpad on the headlamp. ``Flash'' means a cycle of activation and deactivation of a lamp by automaticmeans continuing until stopped either automatically or manually. ``Headlamp test fixture'' means a device designed to support a headlampor headlamp assembly in the test position specified in the laboratory testsand whose mounting hardware and components are those necessary to operatethe headlamp as installed in a motor vehicle. ``Integral Beam Headlamp'' means a headlamp comprising an integral andindivisible optical assembly including lens, reflector, and light source,that is neither a standardized sealed beam headlamp designed to conformto paragraph S7.3 nor a replaceable bulb headlamp designed to conform toparagraph S7.5. ``Replaceable bulb headlamp'' means a headlamp comprising a bonded lensand reflector assembly and one or two standardized replaceable light sources.``Seasoning'' means a process of energizing the filament of a headlamp,at design voltage, for a period of time equal to 1 percent of average ratedlaboratory life. ``Standardized replaceable light source'' means an assembly of a capsule,base, and terminals that meets the requirements of S7.6. S5. <T3>Requirements. </T3>S5.1 <T3>Required motor vehicle lighting equipment. </T3>S5.1.1 Except as provided in succeeding paragraphs of this S5.1.1, eachvehicle shall be equipped with at least the number of lamps, reflectivedevices, and associated equipment specified in Tables I and III, as applicable.Required equipment shall be designed to conform to the SAE Standards ofRecommended Practices referenced in those tables. Table I applies to multipurposepassenger vehicles, trucks, trailers, and buses, 80 or more inches in overallwidth. Table III applies to passenger cars and motorcycles and to multipurposepassenger vehicles, trucks, trailers, and buses, less than 80 inches inoverall width. S5.1.1.1 A truck tractor need not be equipped with turn signal lamps mountedon the rear if the turn signal lamps at or near the front are so constructed(double-faced) and so located that they meet the requirements for double-facedturn signals specified in SAE Standard J588e, <T3>Turn Signal Lamps, </T3>September 1970. S5.1.1.2 A truck tractor need not be equipped with any rear side markerdevices, rear clearance lamps, and rear identification lamps. S5.1.1.3 Intermediate side marker devices are not required on vehiclesless than 30 feet in overall length. S5.1.1.4 Reflective material conforming to Federal Specification L-S-300,<T3>Sheeting and Tape, Reflective; Non-exposed Lens, Adhesive Backing,</T3>September 7, 1965, may be used for side reflex reflectors if thismaterial as used on the vehicle, meets the performance standards in eitherTable I or Table IA of SAE Standard J594f, <T3>Reflex Reflectors, </T3>January 1977. S5.1.1.5 The turn signal operating unit on each passenger car, and multipurposepassenger vehicle, truck, and bus less than 80 inches in overall widthshall be self-canceling by steering wheel rotation and capable of cancellationby a manually operated control. S5.1.1.6 Each stop lamp manufactured to replace a stop lamp that was designedto conform to SAE Standard J586b, <T3>Stop Lamps, </T3>June 1966, may also be designed to conform to J586b.It shall meet the photometric minimum candlepower requirements for ClassA red turn signal lamps specified in SAE Standard J575d, <T3>Test for Motor Vehicle Lighting Devices and Components, </T3>August1967. Each such lamp manufactured for use on a passenger car and on a multipurposepassenger vehicle, truck, trailer or bus less than 80 inches in overallwidth shall have an effective projected luminous area not less than 3\1/2\square inches. If multiple compartment lamps or multiple lamps are used,the effective projected luminous area of each compartment or lamp shallbe not less than 3\1/2\ square inches; however, the photometric requirementsmay be met by a combination of compartments or lamps. S5.1.1.7 Each turn signal lamp manufactured to replace a turn signal lampthat was designed to conform to SAE Standard J588d, <T3>Turn Signal Lamps, </T3>June 1966, may also be designed to conformto J588d, and shall meet the photometric minimum candlepower requirementsfor Class A turn signal lamps specified in SAE Standard J575d, <T3>Tests for Motor Vehicle Lighting Devices and Components, </T3>August1967. Each such lamp manufactured for use on a passenger car and on a multipurposepassenger vehicle, truck, trailer or bus less than 80 inches in overallwidth shall have an effective projected luminous area not less than 3\1/2\square inches. If multiple compartment lamps or multiple lamps are used,the effected projected luminous area of each compartment or lamp shallbe not less than 3\1/2\ square inches; however, the photometric requirementsmay be met by a combination of compartments or lamps. Each such lamp manufacturedfor use on a multipurpose passenger vehicle, truck, trailer or bus 80 inchesor more in overall width shall have an effective projected luminous areanot less than 12 square inches. S5.1.1.8 For each motor vehicle less than 30 feet in overall length, thephotometric and minimum candlepower requirements for side marker lampsspecified in SAE Standard J592e <T3>Clearance, Side Marker, and Identification Lamps, </T3>July 1972, maybe met for all inboard test points at a distance of 15 feet from the vehicleand on a vertical plane that is perpendicular to the longitudinal axisof the vehicle and located midway between the front and rear side markerlamps. S5.1.1.9 A boat trailer whose overall width is 80 inches or more need notbe equipped with both front and rear clearance lamps provided an amber(to front) and red (to rear) clearance lamp is located at or near the midpointon each side so as to indicate its extreme width. S5.1.1.10 Multiple license plate lamps and backup lamps may be used tofufill the requirements of the SAE Standards applicable to such lamps referencedin Tables I and III.S5.1.1.11 A parking lamp, tail lamp, stop lamp, or turn signal lamp shallmeet the minimum percentage specified in Figure 1a of the correspondingminimum allowable value specified in Figure 1b. The maximum candlepoweroutput of each stop, turn signal, tail and parking lamp shall not exceedthat prescribed in Figure 1b. The values specified in Figure 1a and Figure1b are substituted for those specified in Table 1 of the following SAEStandards: J222 <T3>Parking Lamps, </T3>J585e <T3>Tail Lamps </T3>(maximum at H or above), J585c <T3>Stop Lamps, </T3>and J588e <T3>Turn Signal Lamps, </T3>except that motorcycle turn signal lamps needmeet only one-half of the minimum photometric values specified in Figure1b.S5.1.1.12 A parking lamp, tail lamp, stop lamp or turn signal lamp is notrequired to meet the minimum photometric value at each test point specifiedin this standard if the sum of the percentages of the minimum candlepowermeasured at the test points is not less than that specified for each grouplisted in Figure 1c.S5.1.1.13 Each passenger car, and each multipurpose passenger vehicle,truck, and bus of less than 80 inches overall width, shall be equippedwith a turn signal operating unit designed to complete a durability testof 100,000 cycles.S5.1.1.14 A trailer that is less than 30 inches in overall width may beequipped with only one tail lamp, stop lamp, and rear reflex reflector,which shall be located at or near its vertical centerline.S5.1.1.15 A trailer that is less than 6 feet in overall length, includingthe trailer tongue, need not be equipped with front side marker lamps andfront side reflex reflectors.S5.1.1.16 A lamp designed to use a type of bulb that has not been assigneda mean spherical candlepower rating by its manufacturer and is not listedin SAE Standard J573d, <T3>Lamp Bulbs and Sealed Units, </T3>December 1968, shall meet the applicablerequirements of this standard when used with any bulb of the type specifiedby the lamp manufacturer, operated at the bulb's design voltage. A lampthat contains a sealed-in bulb shall meet these requirements with the bulboperated at the bulb's design voltage.S5.1.1.17 Except for a lamp having a sealed-in bulb, a lamp shall meetthe applicable requirements of this standard when tested with a bulb whosefilament is positioned within andplusmin;.010 inch of the nominal designposition specified in SAE Standard J573d, <T3>Lamp Bulbs and Sealed Units, </T3>December 1968, or specified by thebulb manufacturer.S5.1.1.18 A backup lamp is not required to meet the minimum photometricvalues at each test point specified in Table I of SAE Standard J593c, <T3>Backup Lamps, </T3>February 1968 if the sum of the candlepower measuredat the test points within each group listed in Figure 2 is not less thanthe group totals specified in that figure.S5.1.1.19 Each variable load turn signal flasher shall comply with voltagedrop and durability requirements of SAE Standard J590b, <T3>Turn Signal Flashers, </T3>October 1965 with the maximum design loadconnected, and shall comply with starting time, flash rate, and percentcurrent ``on'' time requirements of J590b both with the minimum and withthe maximum design load connected.S5.1.1.20 The lowest voltage drop for turn signal flashers and hazard warningsignal flashers measured between the input and load terminals shall notexceed 0.8 volt.S5.1.1.21 A motor-driven cycle whose speed attainable in 1 mile is 30 mphor less need not be equipped with turn signal lamps.S5.1.1.22 A motor-driven cycle whose speed attainable in 1 mile is 30 mphor less may be equipped with a stop lamp whose effective projected luminouslens area is not less than 3\1/2\ square inches and whose photometric outputfor the groups of test points specified in Figure 1 is at least one-halfof the minimum values set forth in that figure.S5.1.1.23 Each tail lamp manufactured to replace a tail lamp designed toconform to SAE Standard J585d, <T3>Tail Lamps, </T3>August 1970, may also be designed to conform to J585d.S5.1.1.24 Each turn signal lamp manufactured to replace a turn signal lamp(on a motorcycle) that was designed to conform to SAE Standard J588d, <T3>Turn Signal Lamps, </T3>June 1966, may also be designed to conformto J588d.S5.1.1.25 Each turn signal lamp on a motorcycle manufactured on and afterJanuary 1, 1973, shall have an effective projected luminous area of notless than 3\1/2\ square inches.S5.1.1.26 Note 6 of Table 1 in SAE Standard J588e, <T3>Turn Signal Lamps, </T3> September 1970, does not apply. A stop lampthat is not optically combined with a turn signal lamp shall remain activatedwhen the turn signal is flashing.S5.1.1.27 Each passenger car manufactured on or after September 1, 1985,shall be equipped with a high-mounted stop lamp which:(a) Shall have an effective projected luminous area not less than 4\1/2\square inches.(b) Shall have a signal visible to the rear through a horizontal anglefrom 45 degrees to the left to 45 degrees to the right of the longitudinalaxis of the vehicle.(c) Shall have the minimum photometric values in the amount and locationlisted in Figure 10, instead of those in Table 1 of SAE Recommended PracticeJ186a, <T3>Supplemental High-Mounted Stop and Rear Turn Signal Lamps, </T3>September1977.(d) Need not meet the requirements of paragraphs 3.1.6 Moisture Test, 3.1.7Dust Test, and 3.1.8 Corrosion Test of SAE Recommended Practice J186a ifit is mounted inside the vehicle.(e) Shall provide access for convenient replacement of the bulb withoutthe use of special tools.S5.1.1.28 Instead of the headlamps specified by Table III, a motorcyclemay be equipped with one half of any headlighting system specified in S7which provides both a full upper beam and full lower beam, and where morethan one lamp must be used, the lamps shall be mounted vertically, withthe lower beam as high as practicable. When installed on a motorcycle suchhalf system need not meet the aiming requirements specified in S7.S5.1.2 Plastic materials used for optical parts such as lenses and reflectorsshall conform to SAE Recommended Practice J576c, May 1970, except that:(a) Plastic lenses used for inner lenses or those covered by another materialand not exposed directly to sunlight shall meet the requirements of paragraphs3.4 and 4.2 of SAE J576c, when covered by the outer lens or other material;(b) After the outdoor exposure test, the haze and loss of surface lusterof plastic materials used for lamp lenses shall not be greater than 30percent haze as measured by ASTM-1003-61, <T3>Haze and Luminous Transmittance of Transparent Plastic</T3>; and(c) After the outdoor exposure test, plastic materials used for reflexreflectors shall meet the appearance requirements of paragraph 4.2.2 ofSAE J576c.S5.1.3 No additional lamp, reflective device or other motor vehicle equipmentshall be installed that impairs the effectiveness of lighting equipmentrequired by this standard.S5.1.4 Each school bus shall be equipped with a system of either:(a) Four red signal lamps designed to conform to SAE Standard J887, <T3>School Bus Red Signal Lamps</T3>, July 1964, and installed in accordancewith that standard; or(b) Four red signal lamps designed to conform to SAE Standard J887, <T3>School Bus Red Signal Lamps</T3>, July 1964, and four amber signallamps designed to conform to that standard, except for their color, andexcept that their candlepower shall be at least 2\1/2\ times that specifiedfor red signal lamps. Both red and amber lamps shall be installed in accordancewith SAE Standard J887, except that:(i) Each amber signal lamp shall be located near each red signal lamp,at the same level, but closer to the vertical centerline of the bus; and(ii) The system shall be wired so that the amber signal lamps are activatedonly by manual or foot operation, and if activated, are automatically deactivatedand the red signal lamps automatically activated when the bus entrancedoor is opened.S5.1.5 The color in all lamps, reflective devices, and associated equipmentto which this standard applies shall comply with SAE Standard J578c, <T3>Color Specification for Electric Signal Lighting Devices</T3>, February1977.S5.2 <T3>Other requirements.</T3>S5.2.1 The words ``it is recommended that,'' ``recommendations,'' or ``shouldbe'' appearing in any SAE Standard or Recommended Practice referenced orsubreferenced in this standard shall be read as setting forth mandatoryrequirements, except that the aiming pads on the lens face and the blackarea surrounding the signal lamp recommended in SAE Standard J887, <T3>School Bus Red Signal Lamps</T3>, July 1964, are not required.S5.2.2 The words ``Type 1 (5\3/4\andmin16;andmin16;),'' ``Type 2 (5\3/4\andmin16;andmin16;),''``Type 2 (7andmin16;andmin16;),'' ``Type 1A,'' ``Type 2A,'' and ``Type 2B''appearing in any SAE Standard or Recommended Practice reference or subreferencedin this standard shall also be read as setting forth requirements respectivelyfor the following types of headlamps: 1C1, 2C1, 2D1, 1A1, 2A1, and 2B1.S5.3 <T3>Location of required equipment.</T3>S5.3.1 Except as provided in succeeding paragraphs of S5.3.1, each lamp,reflective device, and item of associated equipment shall be securely mountedon a rigid part of the vehicle other than glazing that is not designedto be removed except for repair, in accordance with the requirements ofTable I or III and in location specified in Table II (multipurpose passengervehicles, trucks, trailers, and buses 80 or more inches in overall width)or Table IV (all passenger cars, and motorcycles, and multi-purpose passengervehicles, truck, trailers and buses less than 80 inches in overall width),as applicable.S5.3.1 Except as provided in S5.3.1.1.1, each lamp and reflective deviceshall be located so that it meets the visibility requirements specifiedin any applicable SAE Standard or Recommended Practice. In addition, nopart of the vehicle shall prevent a parking lamp, taillamp, stop lamp,turn signal lamp, or backup lamp from meeting its photometric output atany applicable group of test points specified in Figures 1c and 2, or preventany other lamp from meeting the photometric output at any test point specifiedin any applicable SAE Standard or Recommended Practice. However, if motorvehicle equipment (e.g., mirrors, snow plows, wrecker booms, backhoes,and winches) prevents compliance with this paragraph by any required lampor reflective devices, an auxiliary lamp or device meeting the requirementsof this paragraph shall be provided.S5.3.1.1.1 Clearance lamps may be mounted at a location other than on thefront and rear if necessary to indicate the overall width of a vehicle,or for protection from damage during normal operation of the vehicle, andat such a location they need not be visible at 45 degrees inboard.S5.3.1.2 On a truck tractor, the red rear reflex reflectors may be mountedon the back of the cab, at a minimum height not less than 4 inches abovethe height of the rear tires.S5.3.1.3 On a trailer, the amber front side reflex reflectors and amberfront side marker lamps may be located as far forward as practicable exclusiveof the trailer tongue.S5.3.1.4 When the rear identification lamps are mounted at the extremeheight of a vehicle, rear clearance lamps need not meet the requirementof Table II that they be located as close as practicable to the top ofthe vehicle.S5.3.1.5 The center of the lens referred to in SAE Standard J593c, <T3>Backup Lamps</T3>, February 1968, is the optical center.S5.3.1.6 On a truck tractor, clearance lamps mounted on the cab may belocated to indicate the width of the cab, rather than the overall widthof the vehicle.S5.3.1.7 The requirement that there be not less than 4 inches between afront turn signal lamp and a low beam headlamp, specified in SAE StandardJ588e, <T3>Turn Signal Lamps</T3>, September 1970, shall not apply if the sumof the candlepower values of the turn signal lamp measured at the testpoints within each group listed in Figure 1c is not less than two and one-halftimes the sum specified for each group for yellow turn signal lamps.S5.3.1.8 Each high-mounted stop lamp shall be mounted with its center onthe vertical centerline of the passenger car as the car is viewed fromthe rear. The lamp may be mounted at any position on the centerline, includingthe glazing. If the lamp is mounted inside the vehicle, means shall beprovided to minimize reflections from the light of the lamp upon the rearwindow glazing that might be visible to the driver when viewed directly,or indirectly in the rearview mirror. If the lamp is mounted below therear window, no portion of the lens shall be lower than 6 inches belowthe rear window on convertibles, or 3 inches on other passenger cars.S5.4 <T3>Equipment combinations.</T3>S5.4.1 Two or more lamps, reflective devices, or items of associated equipmentmay be combined if the requirements for each lamp, reflective device, anditem of associated equipment are met, except that no clearance lamp maybe combined optically with any taillamp or identification lamp, and nohigh-mounted stop lamp shall be combined with any other lamp or reflectivedevice.S5.5 <T3>Special wiring requirements.</T3>S.5.5.1 Each vehicle shall have a means of switching between lower andupper beams that conforms to SAE Recommended Practice J564a <T3>Headlamp Beam Switching</T3>, April 1964 or to SAE Recommended PracticeJ565b, <T3>Semi-Automatic Headlamp Beam Switching Devices</T3>, February 1969.Except as provided in S5.5.8, the lower and upper beams shall not be energizedsimultaneously except momentarily for temporary signalling purposes orduring switching between beams.S5.5.2 Each vehicle shall have a means for indicating to the driver whenthe upper beams of the headlamps are on that conforms to SAE RecommendedPractice J564a, April 1964, except that the signal color need not be red.S5.5.3 The tail lamps on each vehicle shall be activated when the headlampsare activated in a steady-burning state.S5.5.4 The stop lamps on each vehicle shall be activated upon applicationof the service brakes. The high-mounted stop lamp on each passenger carshall be activated only upon application of the service brakes.S5.5.5 The vehicular hazard warning signal operating unit on each vehicleshall operate independently of the ignition or equivalent switch, and whenactivated, shall cause to flash simultaneously sufficient turn signal lampsto meet, as a minimum, the turn signal lamp photometric requirements ofthis standard.S5.5.6 Each vehicle equipped with a turn signal operating unit shall alsohave an illuminated pilot indicator. Failure of one or more turn signallamps to operate shall be indicated in accordance with SAE Standard J588e,<T3>Turn Signal Lamps</T3>, September 1970, except when a variable-loadturn signal flasher is used on a truck, bus, or multipurpose passengervehicle 80 or more inches in overall width, on a truck that is capableof accommodating a slide-in camper, or on any vehicle equipped to tow trailers.S5.5.7 On each passenger car and motorcycle, and on each multipurpose passengervehicle, truck, and bus of less than 80 inches overall width:(a) When the parking lamps are activated, the tail lamps, license platelamps, and side marker lamps shall also be activated; and(b) When the headlamps are activated in a steady-burning state, the taillamps, parking lamps, license plate lamps and side marker lamps shall alsobe activated.S5.5.8 On a motor vehicle equipped with a headlighting system designedto conform to the photometric requirements of Figure 15, the lamps marked``L'' or ``LF'' may be wired to remain permanently activated when the lampsmarked ``U'' or ``UF'' are activated. On a motor vehicle equipped withan Integral Beam headlighting system meeting the photometric requirementsof paragraph S7.4(a)(2), the lower beam headlamps shall be wired to remainpermanently activated when the upper beam headlamps are activated.S5.5.9 The wiring harness or connector assembly of each headlamp systemshall be designed so that only those filaments necessary for meeting lowerbeam photometrics are energized when the beam selector switch is in thelower beam position, and that only those filaments necessary for meetingupper beam photometrics are energized when the beam selector switch isin the upper beam position.S5.5.10 The wiring requirements for lighting equipment in use are:(a) Turn signal lamps, hazard warning signal lamps, and school bus warninglamps shall be wired to flash;(b) High-mounted stop lamps on passenger cars manufactured on or afterAugust 1, 1984, but before September 1, 1986, may flash when the hazardwarning system is activated.(c) Headlamps and side marker lamps may be wired to flash for signalingpurposes;(d) A motorcycle headlamp may be wired to allow either its upper beam orits lower beam, but not both, to modulate from a higher intensity to alower intensity in accordance with section S5.6;(e) All other lamps shall be wired to be steady-burning.S5.6 <T3>Motorcycle headlamp modulation system.</T3>S5.6.1 A headlamp on a motorcycle may be wired to modulate either the upperbeam or the lower beam from its maximum intensity to a lesser intensityprovided that:(a) The rate of modulation shall be 240 andplusmin; 40 cycles per minute.(b) The headlamp shall be operated at maximum power for 50 to 70 percentof each cycle.(c) The lowest intensity at any test point shall be not less than 17 percentof the maximum intensity measured at the same point.(d) The modulator switch shall be wired in the power lead of the beam filamentbeing modulated and not in the ground side of the circuit.(e) Means shall be provided so that both the lower beam and upper beamremain operable in the event of a modulator failure.(f) The system shall include a sensor mounted with the axis of its sensingelement perpendicular to a horizontal plane. Headlamp modulation shallcease whenever the level of light emitted by a tungsten filament lightoperating at 3000anddegrees; Kelvin is either less than 270 lux (25 foot-candles)of direct light for upward pointing sensors or less than 60 lux (5.6 foot-candles)of reflected light for downward pointing sensors. The light is measuredby a silicon cell type light meter that is located at the sensor and pointingin the same direction as the sensor. A Kodak Gray Card (Kodak R-27) isplaced at ground level to simulate the road surface in testing downwardpointing sensors. (g) When tested in accordance with the test profile shown in Figure 9,the voltage drop across the modulator when the lamp is on at all test conditionsfor 12 volt systems and 6 volt systems shall not be greater than .45 volt.The modulator shall meet all the provisions of the standard after completionof the test profile shown in Figure 9. (h) Means shall be provided so that both the lower and upper beam functionat design voltage when the headlamp control switch is in either the loweror upper beam position when the modulator is off. S5.6.2(a) Each motorcycle headlamp modulator not intended as original equipment,or its container, shall be labeled with the maximum wattage, and the minimumwattage appropriate for its use. Additionally, each such modulator shallcomply with S5.6.1 (a) through (g) when connected to a headlamp of themaximum rated power and a headlamp of the minimum rated power, and shallprovide means so that the modulated beam functions at design voltage whenthe modulator is off. (b) Instructions, with a diagram, shall be provided for mounting the lightsensor including location on the motorcycle, distance above the road surface,and orientation with respect to the light. S5.7 <T3>Replacement Equipment. </T3>S5.7.1 Each lamp, reflective device, or item of associated equipment manufacturedto replace any lamp, reflective device, or item of associated equipmenton any vehicle to which this standard applies, shall be designed to comformwith this standard. S5.7.2 Unless otherwise specified in this standard, each lamp, reflectivedevice, or item of associated equipment to which section S5.7.1 appliesmay be labeled with the symbol DOT, which shall constitute a certificationthat it conforms to applicable Federal motor vehicle safety standards.S6. <T3>Subreferenced SAE Standards and Recommended Practices.</T3>S6.1 SAE Standards and Recommended Practices subreferenced by the SAE Standardsand Recommended Practices included in Tables I and III and paragraphs S5.1.4and S5.5.1 are those published in the 1970 edition of the SAE Handbook,except that the SAE standard referred to as ``J575'' is J575e, <T3>Tests for Motor Vehicle Lighting Devices and Components, </T3>August1970, for stop lamps, tail lamps, and turn signal lamps designed to conformto SAE Standards J586c, J585d/J585e, and J588e, respectively, and for high-mountedstop lamps designed to conform to SAE Recommended Practice J186a. The referencein J585e to J256 does not apply. For headlamps, unless otherwise specifiedin this standard, the version of SAE Standard J575 is JUN80, and the versionof SAE Standard J602 is OCT80. S6.2 Requirements of SAE Standards incorporated by reference in this standard,other than J576b and J576c, do not include test for warpage of deviceswith plastic lenses. S7 <T3>Headlighting requirements.</T3>S7.1 Each passenger car, multipurpose passenger vehicle, truck, and busshall be equipped with a headlighting system designed to conform to therequirements of S7.3, S7.4, or S7.5. S7.2 The lens of each original equipment and replacement equipment headlamp,and each beam contributor manufactured on or after December 1, 1989, shallbe marked with the symbol ``DOT,'' either horizontally or vertically, whichshall constitute the certification required by 15 U.S.C. 1403. The lensof each headlamp and each beam contributor manufactured on or after December1, 1989, shall also be marked with the manufacturer's or importer's nameand/or trademark registered with the U.S. Patent Office, and each headlampor beam contributor with its voltage, and with its part or trade number.S7.3 <T3>Sealed beam headlighting system.</T3> A sealed beam headlighting systemshall be designed to meet the requirements of one of the following subparagraphsof S7.3.2 through S7.3.9. In references to Figures in SAE J1383 APR85 forheadlamp dimensional requirements, only those dimensions marked ``I'' forinterchangeability are applicable. S7.3.1 The lens of each sealed beam headlamp designed to conform to S7.3.2through S7.3.6 shall be marked according to paragraph 5.4.3 through 5.4.5of SAE Standard J1383 APR85 <T3>Performance Requirements for Motor Vehicle Headlamps.</T3>S7.3.2 <T3>Type A headlighting system. </T3>A Type A headlighting system consistsof two Type 1A1 and two Type 2A1 headlamps and associated hardware, whichare designed to conform to the following requirements: (a) SAE Standard J1383 APR85 <T3>Performance Requirements for Motor Vehicle Headlamps</T3>, with thefollowing exceptions: (1) Paragraphs 1, 2.1.2, 2.8.2, 3, 4.1.1, 4.1.3, 4.4, 4.6, 4.8 through4.18, 5.1.1, 5.1.3, 5.1.5, 5.1.7 through 5.1.16, 5.2.2, 5.3.5, 5.4.1, 5.4.2,and 6 through 6.4 do not apply. (2) In paragraph 5.3.2, the words ``and retaining rings'' are omitted.(3) In paragraphs 4.5.2 and 5.1.6, the words ``either Table 1 or Table2 of SAE J579 DEC84 as appropriate'' are substituted for ``Table 3.'' (b) SAE Standard J580 DEC86 <T3>Sealed Beam Headlamp Assembly</T3> (except paragraphs 3, 4.1.1, 5.1.1.1,5.1.2.3, and the second sentence of 5.1.6); in 5.2.1, delete the words``and retaining rings;'' the correct reference is SAE J1383 Figures 6,9, 12 and 14. (c) After a vibration test conducted in accordance with paragraph S8.9,there shall be no evidence of loose or broken parts, other than filaments,visible without magnification. (d) The maximum wattage at 12.8 volts (design voltage): Single filamentheadlamp, 55 watts on the upper beam; dual filament headlamp, 43 wattson the upper beam and 65 watts on the lower beam. S7.3.3 <T3>Type B headlighting system</T3>. A Type B headlighting system consistsof two Type 2B1 headlamps and associated hardware, which are designed toconform to the following requirements: (a) The requirements of paragraphs S7.3.2 (a) through (c). (b) The maximum wattage at 12.8 volts (design voltage): 70 watts on theupper beam and 60 watts on the lower beam. S7.3.4 <T3>Type C headlighting system.</T3> A Type C headlighting system consistsof two Type 1C1 and two Type 2C1 headlamps and associated hardware, whichare designed to conform to the requirements of paragraph S7.3.2 (a) through(d). S7.3.5 <T3>Type D headlighting system.</T3> A Type D headlighting system consistsof two Type 2D1 headlamps and associated heardware, which are designedto conform to the requirements of paragraph S7.3.2 (a) through (c). S7.3.6 <T3>Type E headlighting system. </T3>A Type E headlighting system consistsof two Type 2E1 headlamps and associated hardware, which are designed toconform to the requirements of paragraph S7.3.2 (a) through (c). S7.3.7 <T3>Type F headlighting system. </T3>A Type F headlighting system consistsof two Type UF and two Type LF headlamps and associated hardware, whichare designed to conform to the following requirements: (a) Figures 11, 12, 13, and 14 as appropriate. (b) The photometric requirements of Figure 15 of this standard. A reaimtolerance of +/^ \1/4\ degree is allowed for any test point on the TypeLF lamp when tested alone, but is not allowed on the Type UF lamp whentested alone. For the test point 10U-90U, measurement shall be from thenormally exposed surface of the lens face. (c) SAE Standard J1383 APR85 <T3>Performance Requirements for Motor Vehicle Headlamps</T3>, Sections2.4, 2.5, 2.6, 4.1, and 4.1.4.(d) When tested in accordance with section (c), the mounted assembly (eitherType UF or Type LF headlamps, respective mounting ring, aiming ring, andaim adjustment mechanism) shall be designed to conform to the requirementsof Figure 15 for upper or lower beams respectively without reaim when anyconforming Type UF or LF headlamp is tested and replaced by another conformingheadlamp of the same Type.(e) SAE J580 DEC86 <T3>Sealed Beam Headlamp Assembly</T3> with the following exceptions:(1) Section 2.2 Mounting Ring reads: ``the adjustable ring upon which thesealed beam unit is mounted and which forces the sealed beam unit to seatagainst the aiming ring when assembled into a sealed beam assembly.''(2) The definition ``2.3 Aiming Ring'' reads: ``The clamping ring thatretains the sealed beam unit against the mounting ring, and that providesan interface between the unit's aiming/seating pads and the headlamp aimeradapter (locating plate).''(3) Section 4.1.1 Vibration Test does not apply.(4) Section 5.1.1.1 does not apply.(5) Section 5.1.2.1 reads: ``When the headlamp assembly is tested in thelaboratory, a minimum aiming adjustment of +/^ 2.5 degrees shall be providedin the horizontal plane and +/^ 4 degrees in the vertical plane.''(6) Section 5.1.2.2 concludes: ``* * * through an angle of +/^ 2.5 degreesand +/^ 4 degrees respectively.''(7) Section 5.1.6 is retitled ``Retaining Ring/Aiming Ring Tests,'' andadd: ``92 x 150 mm . . . 0.340 in (8.6 mm).''(8) Figures 2, 3, and 4 do not apply, and the reference to them in section4.5 is replaced by ``Figure 16, Deflectometer, of Federal Motor VehicleSafety Standard No. 108.''(f) A lens for a Type F headlamp incorporating an upper beam shall be labeled``UF''. A lens for a Type F headlamp incorporating a lower beam shall belabeled ``LF''. The face of letters, numbers, or other symbols molded onthe surface of the lens shall not be raised more than 0.020 in (0.5 mm),and shall be placed no closer to the photometric center of the lens than2.75 in. (70 mm.). The marking shall be molded in the lens and shall benot less than \1/4\ in. (6.35 mm) in size.(g) The maximum wattage at 12.8 volts (design voltage): 70 watts on theupper beam and 60 watts on the lower beam.(h) Type F headlamps may be mounted on common or parallel seating and aimingplanes to permit simultaneous aiming of both headlamps provided that whentested with any conforming Type UF and LF headlamps according to SectionS10:(1) The assembly (consisting of the Type UF and LF headlamps, mountingrings, the aiming/seating rings, and aim adjustment mechanism), shall bedesigned to conform to the test point values of Figure 15.(2) There shall be no provision for adjustment between the common or parallelaiming and seating planes of the two lamps.(i) After a vibration test conducted in accordance with paragraph S8.9,the Type F system shall show no evidence of loose or broken parts, otherthan filaments, visible without magnification.S7.3.8 <T3>Type G headlighting system</T3>. A Type G headlamp system consistsof two Type 1G1 headlamps and two Type 2G1 headlamps each of which is designedto conform to the following requirements:(a) Figures 18 and 21.(b) SAE Standard J1383 APR85 <T3>Performance Requirements for Motor Vehicle Headlamps</T3> (except paragraphs1, 2.1.2, 2.8.2,3, 4.1.1, 4.1.3, 4.4, 4.6, 4.8 through 4.18, 5.1.1, 5.1.3,5.1.5 through 5.1.16, 5.2.2, 5.3.5 through 6.4). In paragraph 5.3.2 thewords ``and retaining rings'' are omitted. In paragraph 4.5.2, the words``either Table 1 or Table 2 of SAE J579 DEC84, as appropriate'' are substitutedfor the words ``Table 3.''(c) SAE Standard J580 DEC86 <T3>Sealed Beam Headlamp Assembly</T3>, with the following exceptions:(1) Sections 2.2, 2.3, 4.1.1, 5.1.1.1, 5.1.2.3, 5.1.6, and 5.2.1.(2) Section 4.5 reads: ``<T3>Torque Deflection Test</T3>. The headlamp assembly to be tested shallbe mounted in the designed vehicle position and set at nominal aim (0.0).A special adapter (Figure 22) for the deflectometer (Figure 3) shall beclamped onto the headlamp assembly. A torque of 20 in/lbs (2.25 N-m) shallbe applied to the headlamp assembly through the deflectometer, and a readingon the thumb wheel shall be taken. The torque shall be removed and a secondreading on the thumb wheel shall be taken.''(d) After a vibration test conducted in accordance with paragraph S8.9,there shall be no evidence of loose or broken parts, other than filaments,visible without magnification.(e) The maximum wattage at 12.8 volts (design voltage) for the 1G1 and2G1 upper beam is 55 watts and 43 watts respectively; for the 2G1 lowerbeam, 65 watts.(f) A lens for a Type G headlamp incorporating only part of an upper beamshall be labeled 1G1. A lens for a Type G headlamp incorporating both partof an upper beam and a lower beam shall be labeled 2G1. The face of letters,numbers, or other symbols molded on the surface of the lens shall not beraised more than 0.020 in. (0.5 mm.), and shall be placed no closer tothe geometric center of the lens than 2.75 in. (70 mm.). The marking shallbe molded in the lens and shall be not less than \1/4\ in. (6.35 mm) insize.S7.3.9 <T3>Type H headlighting system. </T3>A Type H headlamp system consistingof two Type 2H1 headlamps and associated hardware, which are designed toconform to the following requirements:(a) Paragraph S7.3.8 (a) through (d).(b) The maximum wattage at 12.8 volts (design voltage): 70 watts on theupper beam and 60 watts on the lower beam.(c) A lens for a Type H headlamp incorporating both and upper beam anda lower beam shall be labeled 2H1. The face of letters, numbers, or othersymbols molded on the surface of the lens shall not be raised more than0.020 in. (0.5 mm), and shall be placed no closer to the geometric centerof the lens than 2.75 in. (70 mm.) The marking shall be molded in the lensand shall be not less than \1/4\ in. (6.35 mm) in size. S7.4 <T3>Integral Beam Headlighting System. </T3>An integral beam headlightingsystem shall be designed to conform to the following requirements: (a) The system shall provide in total not more than two upper beams andtwo lower beams of the performance described in one of the following: (1) Figure 15; (2) Figure 15 except that the upper beam test point values at 2\1/2\D-Vand 2\1/2\D-12R and 12L shall apply to the lower beam headlamp and notto the upper beam test point value at 1\1/2\D-9R and 9L shall be 1,000;(3) Figure 17; (4) Table 1 of SAE J579 DEC84; or (5) Table 2 of SAE J579 DEC84. (b) In a four-headlamp system, each upper beam headlamp and each lowerbeam headlamp shall be designed to conform to the photometrics of one ofthe following: (1) Figure 15; (2) Figure 15 with the exceptions specified in subsection (a) of this section;or (3) Table 2 of SAE J579 DEC84. (c) In a two-headlamp system, each headlamp shall be designed to conformto the photometrics of one of the following:  (1) Figure 17; or  (2) Table 1 of SAE J579 DEC 84.  (d) In a system in which there is more than one beam contributor providinga lower beam, and/or more than one beam contributor providing an upperbeam, each beam contributor in the system shall be designed to meet onlythe photometric performance requirements of paragraph S7.4(a)(1) basedupon the following mathematical expression: conforming test point value= 2(Figure 15 test point value)/total number of lower or upper beam contributorsfor the vehicle, as appropriate. The system shall be designed to use theVehicle Headlamp Aiming Device (VHAD) as specified in paragraph S7.7.5.2. (e) The lower and upper beams shall be provided only as follows where eachheadlamp contains two light sources:  (1) The lower beam shall be provided either by the most outboard lightsource (or the uppermost if arranged vertically), or by all light sources. (2) The upper base shall be provided either by the most inboard light source(or the lowermost if arranged vertically), or by all light sources.  (f) The lower and upper beams shall be provided only as follows where eachheadlamp contains a single filament:  (1) The lower beam shall be provided by the most outboard headlamps (orthe uppermost if arranged vertically), and the lens of each such headlampshall be permanently marked with the letter ``L.''  (2) The upper beam shall be provided by the most inboard headlamps (orlowermost if arranged vertically), and the lens of each such headlamp shallbe permanently marked with the letter ``U.''  (g) A tolerance of +/^ \1/4\ degree reaim tolerance during photometricperformance tests is permitted for any headlamp. The test point 10U-90Ushall be measured from the normally exposed surface of the lens face. (h) A headlamp or beam contributor designed to meet S7.4(b) and S7.7.5.1may be mounted in an assembly to permit simultaneous aiming of the beam(s)contributors, provided that with any complying contributor the assemblycomplete with all lamps meets the appropriate photometric requirementswhen tested in accordance with S10.  (i) Each integral beam headlamp system shall be designed to conform tothe applicable photometric performance requirements in subsections (a)through (d) of this section when tested in accordance with Sections 4.1and 4.1.4 of SAE Standard J1383 APR85 with any headlamps intended for usein such system. The term ``aiming plane'' means ``aiming reference plane,''or an appropriate vertical plane defined by the manufacturer as requiredin paragraph S7.7.1.  (j) The system shall be aimable in accordance with the requirements ofparagraph S7.7. A system that incorporates any headlamp or beam contributorthat does not have a VHAD as an integral and indivisible part of the headlampor beam contributor shall be designed so that the appropriate photometricsare met when any correctly aimed and photometrically conforming headlampor beam contributor is removed from its mounting and aiming mechanism,and is replaced without reaim by any conforming headlamp or beam contributorof the same type.  (k) A headlamp with a glass lens need not meet the abrasion resistance(S8.2), chemical resistance (S8.3), or impact (S8.8) tests. If, in additionto a glass lens, the headlamp uses a non-plastic reflector, it need notmeet the internal heat test of paragraph S8.6.2. A headlamp of sealed designas verified in paragraph S8.10 <T3>Sealing </T3>need not meet the corrosion (S8.4), dust (S8.5), or humidity(S8.7) tests, however, the headlamp shall meet the requirements of paragraphs4.1, 4.1.2, 4.4 and 5.1.4 for corrosion and connector of SAE Standard J580DEC86 <T3>Sealed Beam Headlamp Assembly.</T3>  (1) When tested according to any of the procedures indicated in subparagraphs(i) through (viii) each headlamp or beam contributor shall meet the appropriaterequirement:  (i) After an abrasion test conducted in accordance with paragraph S8.2,the headlamp shall meet the photometric requirements applicable to theheadlamp system under test.  (ii) After a chemical resistance test involving exposure to any of thefluids listed in paragraph S8.3, there shall be no surface deterioration,coating delamination, fractures, deterioriation of bonding materials, colorbleeding or color pickup visible without magnification, and the headlampshall meet the photometric requirements applicable to the headlamp systemunder test.  (iii) After a corrosion test conducted in accordance with paragraph S8.4there shall be no evidence of external or internal corrosion or rust visiblewithout magnification. Loss of adhesion of any applied coating shall notoccur more than 0.125 in. (3.2 mm) from any sharp edge on the inside oroutside. Corrosion may occur on terminals only if the current producedduring the test of paragraph S8.4(c) is not less than 9.7 amperes.  (iv) After a dust test conducted in accordance with paragraph S8.5, theheadlamp shall meet the photometric requirements applicable to the headlampsystem under test.  (v) The headlamp shall first meet the requirements of subparagraph (A)and then those of subparagraph (B).  (A) After a temperature cycle test conducted in accordance with paragraphS8.6.1, the headlamp shall show no evidence of delamination, fractures,entry of moisture or deterioration of bonding material, color bleeding,warpage or deformation visible without magnification or lens warpage greaterthan .118 in (3 mm) when measured parallel to the optical axis at the pointof intersection of the axis of each light source with the exterior surfaceof the lens, and it shall meet the photometric requirements applicableto the headlamp system under test.  (B) After an internal heat test conducted in accordance with paragraphS8.6.2. there shall be no lens warpage greater than .118 in (3 mm) whenmeasured parallel to the optical axis at the point of intersection of theaxis of each light source with the exterior surface of the lens, and itshall meet the photometric requirements applicable to the headlamp systemunder test.  (vi) After a humidity test conducted in accordance with paragraph S8.7,the inside of the headlamp shall show no evidence of delamination or moisture,fogging or condensation visible without magnification, and the headlampshall meet the photometric requirements applicable to the headlamp systemunder test.  (vii) After an impact test on a headlamp with a plastic lens, conductedin accordance with paragraph S8.8, there shall be no fracture of the adhesionof the lens coating or delamination of materials visible without magnification,and the lens shall not be broken, cracked, or chipped.  (viii) After a vibration test conducted in accordance with paragraph S8.9,there shall be no evidence of loose or broken parts, other than filaments,visible without magnification.  S7.5 <T3>Replaceable Bulb Headlamp System. </T3>Each replaceable bulb headlampsystem shall be designed to conform to the following requirements:  (a) The system shall provide only two lower beams and two upper beams andshall incorporate not more than two standardized replaceable light sourcesin each headlamp.  (b) The photometrics as specified in subsections (c) through (f) belowusing any standardized replaceable light source of the type intended foruse in such system.  (c) The test requirements of sections 4.1 and 4.1.4 of SAE J1383 APR85,using the photometric requirements specified in (a) through (c). The term``aiming plane'' means ``aiming reference plane,'' or an appropriate verticalplane defined by the manufacturer as required in paragraph S7.7.1. A \1/4\degree reaim tolerance is permitted for any test point. The test point1OU-9OU shall be measured from the normally exposed surface of the lensface.(d) For a headlamp equipped with one or two Type HB1 light sources, thefollowing requirements apply:(1) There shall be no mechanism that allows adjustment of an individuallight source or, if there are two light sources, independent adjustmentof each reflector.(2) The lower and upper beams of a headlamp system consisting of two lamps,each containing two light sources, shall be provided as follows:(i) The lower beam shall be provided in one of the following ways:(A) By the outboard light source (or the upper one if arranged vertically)designed to conform to the lower beam requirements of Table 1 of SAE StandardJ579 DEC84; or(B) By both light sources, designed to conform to the lower beam requirementsof Table 1 of SAE Standard J579 DEC84.(ii) The upper beam shall be provided in one of the following ways:(A) By the inboard light source (or the lower one if arranged vertically)designed to conform to the upper beam requirements of Table 1 of SAE StandardJ579 DEC84; or(B) By both light sources, designed to conform to the upper beam requirementsof Table 1 of SAE Standard J579 DEC84.(3) The lower and upper beams of a headlamp system consisting of four lamps,each containing a single light source, shall be provided as follows:(i) The lower beam shall be provided by the outboard lamp (or upper oneif arranged vertically), designed to conform to the lower beam requirementsof Table 1 of SAE Standard J579 DEC84. The lens of each such headlamp shallbe marked with the letter ``L.''(ii) The upper beam shall be provided by the inboard lamp (or lower oneif arranged vertically), designed to conform to the upper beam requirementsof Table 1 of SAE Standard J579 DEC84. The lens of each such headlamp shallbe marked with the letter ``U.''(e) The following requirements apply to a headlamp system equipped withType HB3 and HB4, HB1 and HB3, or HB1 and HB4 light sources:(1) There shall be no mechanism that allows adjustment of an individuallight source, or, if there are two light sources, independent adjustmentof each reflector.(2) The lower and upper beams of a headlamp system consisting of two lamps,each containing two light sources (Type HB3 and HB4, or Type HB1 with HB3or HB4) shall be provided only as follows:(i) The lower beam shall be provided in one of the following ways:(A) By the outboard light source (or the uppermost if arranged vertically)designed to conform to the lower beam requirements of Figure 17; or(B) By both light sources, designed to conform to the lower beam requirementsof Figure 17.(ii) The upper beam shall be provided in one of the following ways:(A) By the inboard light source (or the lower one if arranged vertically)designed to conform to the upper beam requirements of Figure 17; or(B) By both light sources, designed to conform to the lower beam requirementsof Figure 17.(3) The lower and upper beams of a headlamp system consisting of four lamps,using Type HB3 and HB4, HB1 and HB3, or HB1 and HB4 light sources, eachcontaining only a single light source, shall be provided only as follows:(i) The lower beam shall be produced by the outboard lamp (or upper oneif arranged vertically), designed to conform to the lower beam requirementsof Figure 15. The lens of each such headlamp shall be permanently markedwith the letter ``L.''(ii) The upper beam shall be produced by the inboard lamp (or lower oneif arranged vertically), designed to conform to the upper beam requirementsof Figure 15. The lens of each such headlamp shall be marked with the letter``U.''(f) Each lens reflector unit manufactured as replacement equipment shallbe designed to conform to the requirements of paragraphs (e) and (f) ofthis section when any standardized replaceable light source appropriatefor such unit is inserted in it.(g) The lens of each replaceable bulb headlamp using Type HB3 or HB4 lightsources, or Type HB1 light sources in conjunction with Type HB3 or HB4light sources within a headlamp system on a motor vehicle, shall permanentlydisplay the Type designation(s) for that light source on the lens in frontof each light source.(h) The system shall be aimable in accordance with paragraph S7.7.(i) Each headlamp shall meet the requirements of paragraphs S7.4 (k) and(l), except that the sentence in (k) to verify sealing according to S8.10<T3>Sealing </T3>does not apply.S7.6 <T3>Standardized Replaceable Light Sources. </T3>Each standardized replaceablelight source shall be designed to conform to the following requirements:(a) A type HB1 light source shall be designed to conform to the dimensionsspecified in Figure 3 and shall incorporate a silicone O-ring. Its maximumpower on the lower beam shall be 50 watts, and on the upper beam, 70 watts.Its luminous flux in lumens shall be 700+/^15% on the lower beam and 1200+/^15%on the upper beam.(b) A Type HB3 light source shall be designed to conform to the dimensionsspecified in Figure 19. Its maximum power on the upper beam shall be 70watts. Its luminous flux in lumens shall be 1700+/^12% on the upper beam.(c) A Type HB4 light source shall be designed to conform to the dimensionsspecified in Figure 20. Its maximum power shall be 60 watts on the lowerbeam, and its luminous flux in lumens on the lower beam shall be 100 +/^15%. (d) The filament of a light source shall be seasoned before measurementof maximum power and luminous flux. (e) Measurement of maximum power and luminous flux shall be made with thedirect current test voltage regulated within one quarter of one percent.The test voltage shall be design voltage, 12.8v. The measurement of luminousflux shall be in accordance with the Illuminating Engineering Society ofNorth America, LM-45; <T3>IES Approved Method for Electrical and Photometric Measurements ofGeneral Service Incandescent Filament Lamps</T3> (April 1980), shall bemade with the black cap installed on Type HB1 and HB4, and shall be madewith the electrical conductor and light source base shrouded with an opaquewhite colored cover, except for the portion normally located within theinterior of the lamp housing. The measurement of luminous flux for theTypes HB3 and HB4 shall be with the base covered with a white cover shownin Fugures 19-1 and 20-1. The white covers are used to eliminate the likelihoodof incorrect lumen measurement that will occur should the reflectance ofthe light source base and electrical connector be low.(f) The capsule, lead wires and/or terminals, and seal on each Type HB1,Type HB3, and Type HB4 light source shall be installed in the base so asto provide an airtight seal. Such a seal exists when no air bubbles shallappear on the low pressure (connector) side after the light source hasbeen immersed in water for one minute while inserted in a cylindrical apertureof 1.350 to 1.346 in. (34.30 to 34.2 mm) (Type HB1), or 0.796 +/^ 0.004in (20.22 +/^ 0.10 mm) (Type HB3), or 0.875 +/^ 0.004 in (22.2 +/^ 0.1mm) (Type HB4) and subjected to a minimum air pressure of 70kPa (10 P.S.I.G)on the glass capsule side.(g) After the force deflection test conducted in accordance with S9, thepermanent deflection of the glass envelope shall not exceed 0.005 in. (0.13mm) in the direction of the applied force.(h) A general tolerance shall apply to Figure 3 as follows: +/^0.004 in.(0.10 mm) to all linear dimensions and +/^ 1 degree 00 minutes to all angulardimensions except for referenced dimensions and unless otherwise specified.(i) Each standardized light source manufactured on or after December 1,1989, shall be marked with the symbol DOT horizontally or vertically, whichshall constitute the certification required by 15 U.S.C. 1403, and itsbase marked with its HB Type designation, and either with the manufacturer'sor importer's name or with the manufacturer's or importer's trademark thatis registered with the U.S. Patent Office.S7.7 <T3>Aimability Performance Requirements.</T3>S7.7.1 Each headlamp (other than a headlamp designed to conform to paragraphS7.3), or beam contributor, shall be equipped with fiducial marks, aimingpads or similar references of sufficient detail and accuracy for determinationof an appropriate vertical plane to be used with the photometric proceduresof SAE J1383 APR85 for correct alignment with the photometer axis whenbeing tested for photometric compliance, and to serve for the aiming referencewhen the lamp is installed on a motor vehicle. The fiducial marks, aimingpads, or similar references are protrusions, bubble vials, holes, indentations,ridges, scribed lines, or other readily identifiable marks establishedand described by the vertical or lamp manufacturer.S7.7.2 Each headlamp shall be installed on a motor vehicle with a mountingand aiming mechanism that allows aim inspection and adjustment of bothvertical and horizontal aim, and is accessible for those uses without removalof any vehicle parts, except for protective covers removable without theuse of tools. S7.7.2.1 When installed on the vehicle, adjustment of one aim axis throughits full on-vehicle range shall not cause the aim of the other axis todeviate more than +/^ 0.76 degree. If this performance is not achievable,a label meeting the requirements of paragraph S7.7.5.2(b) shall be attachedadjacent to each Vehicle Headlamp Aiming Device (VHAD).S7.7.2.2 If a headlamp is aimed by moving the reflector relative to thelens and headlamp housing, or vice versa, it shall conform with the photometricsapplicable to it with the lens at any position relative to the reflectorwithin the aim range limits of paragraph S7.7.3 and S7.7.4 or any combination.S7.7.3 When a headlamp system is tested in a laboratory, the range of itsvertical aim shall not be less than +/^ 4 degrees from the nominal correctaim position for the intended vehicle application. When installed on amotor vehicle, the range of vertical aim shall be not less than the fullrange of pitch of the vehicle on which the headlamp system is installed.The installed range of pitch angle shall as a minimum be determined fromunloaded vehicle weight to gross vehicle weight rating, and incorporatepitch angle effects from maximum trailer or truck loadings, the full rangeof tire intermix sizes and suspensions recommended and/or installed bythe vehicle manufacturer, and the anticipated effects of suspension sagand variable passenger loading. The vertical aim adjustment mechanism shallbe continuously adjustable over the full range.S7.7.4 When a headlamp system is tested in a laboratory, the range of itshorizontal aim shall not be not less than 2.5 degrees from the nominalcorrect aim position for the intended vehicle application. S7.7.5 When a headlamp system is installed on a motor vehicle, it shallbe aimable with either an externally applied aiming device or on-vehicleheadlamp aiming devices installed by the vehicle manufacturer. When activatedin a steady-burning state, headlamps shall not have any styling ornamentor other feature, such as a translucent cover or grill, in front of thelens. Headlamp wipers may be used in front of the lens provided that theheadlamp system is designed to conform with all applicable photometricrequirements with the wiper stopped in any position in front of the lens.S7.7.5.1 <T3>External aiming.</T3> Each headlamp system that is capable of beingmechanically aimed by externally applied headlamp aiming devices shallbe mechanically aimable using the equipment specified in SAE Standard J602OCT80 <T3>Headlamp Aiming Device for Mechanically Aimable Sealed Beam HeadlampUnits</T3> without the removal of any ornamental trim rings, covers, wipersor other vehicle parts.(a) Each headlamp system that is designed to use such external aiming devicesshall not deviate more than 0.30 degree when a downwad torque of 20 lb.-in.(2.25 N-m) is applied to the headlamp in its normal operating position,through the lamp's mechanical axis at the plane of the forwardmost aimingpad. (b) When a headlamp is installed on a motor vehicle, its aim in any directionshall not change by more than 0.30 degree nor shall the lamp recede morethan 0.1 in. (2.5 mm.) after being subjected to an inward force of 50 pounds(222 newtons) applied evenly to the lens parallel to the mechanical axis.(c) Each headlamp system mounting and aiming mechanism shall be subjectedto a salt spray (fog) test in accordance with ASTM B117-73 <T3>Method of Salt Spray (Fog) Testing</T3> for a period of 50 hours, consistingof two successive 25 hour periods of 24 hours exposure followed by 1 hourof drying. At the end of 50 hours, the headlamp system shall be capableof meeting any of the applicable requirements of paragraph S7.7. (d) Each headlamp system which is designed to use the Headlamp Aiming DeviceLocating Plates with adjustable legs for the 100 andmultiply; 165 mm unitand the 142 andmultiply; 200 mm unit, and which has adjustable length legs,shall meet the requirements of subparagraphs (1) and (2) below.(1) The lens shall have three aiming pads which meet the requirements ofFigure 4, <T3>Dimensional Specifications for Location of Aiming Pads on ReplaceableBulb Headlamp Units.</T3> The aiming pads need not be centered at the geometriccenter of the lens, or on the optical axis. Except as provided in subparagraph(2), a whole number, which represents the distance in tenths of an inch(i.e. 0.3 inch=3) from the aiming reference plane to the respective aimingpads which are not in contact with that plane, shall be inscribed adjacentto each respective aiming pad on the lens. The height of these numbersshall be not less than .157 inch (4 mm). If there is interference betweenthe plane and the area of the lens between the aiming pads, the whole numberrepresents the distance to a secondary plane. The secondary plane shallbe located parallel to the aiming reference plane and as close to the lensas possible without causing interference. (2) If the most forward aiming pad is the lower inboard aiming pad, thenthe dimensions may be placed anywhere on the lens. The dimension for theoutboard aiming pad (Dimension F in Figure 4) shall be followed by theletter ``H'' and the dimension for the center aiming pad shall be followedby the letter ``V.'' The dimensions shall be expressed in tenths of aninch. (e) Each headlamp may be designed to use the nonadjustable Headlamp AimingDevice Locating Plate for the 100andmultiply;165 mm unit, the 142andmultiply;200mm unit, the 146 mm diameter unit, or the 178 mm diameter unit of SAE J602,or the 92andmultiply;150 mm Type F unit, and incorporate lens mounted aimingpads as specified for those units in Figures 10, 13, 5, or 7 respectivelyin SAE J1383 APR85, or Figure 11 of this standard for the Type F unit.If so designed, no additional lens marking is necessary to designate thetype of plate or dimensions. S7.7.5.2 <T3>On-vehicle aiming.</T3> Each headlamp system that is capable of beingaimed by equipment installed on the vehicle shall include a Vehicle HeadlampAiming Device (VHAD) that conforms to the following requirements: (a) <T3>Aim.</T3> The VHAD shall provide for headlamp aim inspection and adjustmentin both the vertical and horizontal axes. (1) <T3>Vertical aim:</T3> The VHAD shall include the necessary referencesand scales relative to the horizontal plane to assure correct verticalaim for photometry and aiming purposes. An off-vehicle measurement of theangle of the plane of the ground is permitted. In addition, an equal numberof graduations from the ``O'' position representing angular changes inthe axis in the upward and downward directions shall be provided. (i) Each graduation shall represent a change in the vertical position ofthe mechanical axis not larger than 0.19 degree (1 in. at 25 ft.) to providefor variations in aim at least 1.2 degrees above and below the horizontal,and have an accuracy relative to the zero mark of less than 0.1 degree.(ii) The VHAD shall be marked to indicate headlamp aim movement in theupward and downward directions. (iii) Each graduation shall indicate a linear movement of the scale indicatorof not less than 0.05 in. (1.27 mm) if a direct reading analog indicatoris used. If a remote reading indicator is provided, it shall representthe actual aim movement in a clear, understandable format. (iv) The vertical indicator shall perform through a minimum range of +/^1.2degrees. (vi) Means shall be provided in the VHAD for compensating for deviationsin floor slope not less than 1.2 degrees from the horizontal that wouldaffect the correct positioning of the headlamp for vertical aim. (vi) The graduations shall be legible under an illumination level not greaterthan 30 foot candles, measured at the top of the radiator, by an observerhaving 20/20 vision (Snellen), and shall permit aim adjustment to within0.19 degree (1 in. at 25 ft.). (2) <T3>Horizontal aim.</T3> The VHAD shall include references and scales relativeto the longitudinal axis of the vehicle necessary to assure correct horizontalaim for photometry and aiming purposes. An ``O'' mark shall be used toindicate alignment of the headlamps relative to the longitudinal axis ofthe vehicle. In addition, an equal number of graduations from the ``O''position representing equal angular changes in the axis relative to thevehicle axis shall be provided. (i) Each graduation shall represent a change in the horizontal positionof the mechanical axis not greater than 0.38 degree (2 in. at 25 ft.) toprovide for variations in aim at least 0.76 degree (4 in. at 25 ft.) tothe left and right of the longitudinal axis of the vehicle, and shall havean accuracy relative to the zero mark of less than 0.1 degree. (ii) The VHAD shall be marked to indicate headlamp aim movement in theleft and right directions. (iii) The graduations shall be legible under an illumination level notgreater than 30 foot candles, measured at the top of the radiator, by anobserver having 20/20 vision (Snellen), and shall permit aim adjustmentto within 0.38 degree (2 in. at 25 ft.). (iv) The horizonal indicator shall perform through a minimum range of <T2>+</T2>/<T2>^</T2>0.76 degree (4 in. at 25 ft.); however, the indicator itselfshall be capable of recalibration over a movement of <T2>+</T2>/<T2>^</T2>2.5 degrees relative to the longitudinal axis of the vehicleto accommodate any adjustment necessary for recalibrating the indicatorafter vehicle repair from accident damage. (b) <T3>Aiming instructions.</T3> The instructions for properly aiming theheadlighting system using the VHAD shall be provided on a label permanentlyaffixed to the vehicle adjacent to the VHAD, or in the vehicle operator'smanual. The instructions shall advise that the headlighting system is properlyaimed if the appropriate vertical plane (as defined by the vehicle manufacturer)is perpendicular to both the longitudinal axis of the vehicle, and a horizontalplane when the vehicle is on a horizontal surface, and the VHAD is seta ``O'' vertical and ``O'' horizontal. Should a remote indicator or a remoteindicator and adjuster be provided, the instructions shall be placed inthe operator's manual, and may also be placed on a label adjacent to theVHAD. (c) <T3>Testing the VHAD.</T3> (1) The headlamp assembly (the headlamp(s) and the integral or separateVHAD mechanism) shall be mounted on a level goniometer, aligned to a photometerlocated not less than 60 ft. (18.3 m) from the VHAD assembly. The assemblyshall be mechanically aimed using the VHAD in accordance with the manufacturer'sinstructions as provided with the vehicle on which the VHAD is intendedto be used. A \1/4\ degree reaim is permitted in any direction at any testpoint to allow for variations in readings between laboratories. The testshall be conducted in accordance with the procedures of paragraphs 4.1and 4.1.4 of SAE J1383 APR85. Under these conditions the mounted headlampassembly shall be designed to conform to the photometric requirements appropriatefor the headlamp system under test.(2) When tested in accordance with subsection (1) of this section, withany replacement headlamp unit(s) or light sources intended for use in thesystem under test, the VHAD and headlamp system shall be designed to conformto the photometric performance requirements appropriate for the systemunder test.(3) The same VHAD and associated headlamp(s) (or headlamp assembly) shallbe rigidly mounted in a headlamp test fixture and comply with the followinglaboratory test procedures:(i) Each graduation on the horizontal and vertical aim scales shall bechecked and any variation from the correct aim shall not exceed +/^ 0.2degree, and +/^ 0.1 degree respectively.(ii) With the aiming plane horizontal and vertical and with the scale onthe device set at 0, the aimer shall be adjusted before each of the followingtests to assure that the indicators are centered at 0.(iii) The VHAD and an unlighted headlamp assembly shall be stabilized at20 +/^ 5 degrees F (^7 +/^ 3 degrees C) in a circulating air environmentaltest chamber. After a period of 30 minutes, when measured at that soaktemperature, the variation from correct horizontal of vertical aim shallnot exceed +/^ 0.2 degree, and +/^ 0.1 degree, respectively.  (iv) The VHAD, and the headlamp assembly with its highest wattage filament(or combination of filaments intended to be used simultaneously) energizedat its design voltage, shall then be stabilized at 100 +/^ 5 degrees F(38 +/^ 3 degrees C) in a circulating air environmental test chamber. Aftera period of 30 minutes, when measured at that soak temperature, the variationfrom correct horizontal and vertical aim small not exceed +/^ 0.2 degree,and +/^ 0.1 degree, respectively.  (v) The VHAD and an unlighted headlamp assembly shall then be placed ina circulating air environmental test chamber and exposed to a temperatureof 140 +/^ 5 degrees F (60 +/^ 3 degrees C) for 24 hours, followed by atemperature of ^40 +/^ 5 degrees F (^40 +/^ 3 degrees C) for 24 hours andthen permitted to return to room temperature, after which the VHAD andheadlamp assembly shall show no damage which would impair its ability toperform as specified herein. The variation from correct horizontal or verticalaim shall not exceed +/^ 0.2 degree, and +/^ 0.1 degree, respectively.(vi) The VHAD and headlamp assembly shall then be tested according to thecorrosion test procedure of paragraph S7.7.5.1(c).(vii) The VHAD and headlamp assembly shall then be tested for photometriccompliance as specified in paragraphs S7.7.5.2(c)(1) and (2).S8 <T3>Tests and Procedures for Integral Beam and Replaceable Bulb HeadlightingSystems. </T3>When tested in accordance with the following procedures,each integral beam headlamp shall meet the requirements of paragraph S7.4,and each replaceable bulb headlamp shall meet the requirements of paragraphS7.5.S8.1 <T3>Photometry. </T3>Each headlamp to which paragraph S8 applies shallbe tested according to paragraphs 4.1 and 4.1.4 of SAE Standard J1383 APR85for meeting the applicable photometric requirements, after each test specifiedin paragraphs S8.2, S8.3, S8.5, S8.6.1, S8.6.2, and S8.7. A \1/4\ degreereaim is permitted in any direction at any testpoint.S8.2 <T3>Abrasion. </T3>(a) A headlamp shall be mounted in the abrasion testfixture in the manner indicated in Figure 5 with the lens facing upward.(b) An abrading pad meeting the requirements in paragraphs (c)(1) through(c)(4) of this section shall be cycled back and forth (1 cycle) for 11cycles at 4 andplusmin; 0.8 in. (10 cm andplusmin; 2 cm) per second over atleast 80 percent of the lens surface, including all the area between theupper and lower aiming pads, but not including lens trim rings and edges.(c) (1) The abrading pad shall be not less than 1.0 andplusmin; .04 in. (2.5cm andplusmin; .1 cm) wide, constructed of 0000 steel wool, and rubber cementedto a rigid base shaped to the same vertical contour of the lens. The ``grain''of the pad shall be perpendicular to the direction of motion.(2) The abrading pad support shall be equal in size to the pad and thecenter of the support surface shall be within andplusmin; .08 in. (andplusmin;2 mm) of parallel to the lens surface.(3) The density of the abrading pad shall be such that when the pad ismounted to its support and is resting unweighted on the lens, the baseof the pad shall be no closer than .125 in. (3.2 mm) to the lens at itsclosest point.(4) When mounted on its support and resting on the lens of the test headlamp,the abrading pad shall then be weighted such that a pad pressure of 2.0andplusmin; .15 psi (14 andplusmin; 1 KPa) exists at the center and perpendicularto the face of the lens.(d) A pivot shall be used if it is required to follow the contour of thelens.(e) Unused steel wool shall be used for each test.S8.3 <T3>Chemical resistance. </T3>(a) The entire exterior lens surface of theheadlamp in the headlamp test fixture and top surface of the lens-reflectorjoint shall be wiped once to the left and once to the right with a 6-inchsquare soft cotton cloth (with pressure equally applied) which has beensaturated once in a container with 2 ounces of a test fluid as listed inparagraph (b). The lamp shall be wiped within 5 seconds after removal ofthe cloth from the test fluid.(b) The test fluids are:(1) ASTM Reference Fuel C, which is composed of Isooctane 50 volume % andToluene 50 volume %. Isooctane must conform to A2.7 in Annex 2 of the MotorFuels Section of the <T3>1985 Annual Book of ASTM Standards, </T3>Vol. 05.04, and Toluene mustconform to ASTM specification D362-84, <T3>Standard Specification for Industrial Grade Toluene. </T3>ASTM ReferenceFuel C must be used as specified in:(i) Paragraph A2.3.2 and A2.3.3 of Annex 2 to <T3>Motor Fuels, Section 1 </T3>in the <T3>1985 Annual Book of ASTM Standards; </T3>and(ii) OSHA Standard 29 CFR 1910.106_<T3>Handling Storage and Use of Flammable Combustible Liquids.</T3>(2) Tar remover (consisting by volume of 45% xylene and 55% petroleum basemineral spirits).(3) Power steering fluid (as specified by the vehicle manufacturer foruse in the motor vehicle on which the headlamp is intended to be installed).(4) Windshield washer fluid consisting of 0.5% monoethanolamine with theremainder 50% concentration of methanol/distilled water by volume.(5) Antifreeze (50% concentration of ethylene glycol/distilled water byvolume).(c) After the headlamp has been wiped with the test fluid, it shall bestored in its designed operating attitude for 48 hours at a temperatureof 73anddegrees; F andplusmin; 7anddegrees; (23anddegrees; C andplusmin; 4anddegrees;)and a relative humidity of 30 andplusmin; 10 percent. At the end of the 48-hourperiod, the headlamp shall be wiped clean with a soft dry cotton clothand visually inspected.S8.4 <T3>Corrosion. </T3>(a) A connector test shall be performed on each filamentcircuit prior to the test in subparagraph (b) according to Figure 1 andSAE Standard J580 DEC86. The power source shall be set to provide 12. 8volts and the resistance shall be set to produce 10 amperes.(b) The headlamp with connector attached to the terminals, unfixtured andits designed operating attitude with all drain holes, breathing devicesor other designed openings in their normal operating positions, shall besubjected to a salt spray (fog) test in accordance with ASTM B117-73, <T3>Method of Salt Spray (Fog) Testing, </T3>for 240 hours, consistingof ten successive 24-hour periods. During each period, the headlamp shallbe mounted in the middle of the chamber and exposed for 23 hours to thesalt spray. The spray shall not be activated during the 24th hours. Thebulb shall be removed from the headlamp and from the test chamber duringthe one hour of salt spray deactivation and reinserted for the start ofthe next test period, at the end of the first and last three 23-hour periodsof salt spray exposure, and at the end of any two of the fourth throughseventh 23-hour periods of salt-spray exposure. The test chamber shallbe closed at all times except for a maximum of 2 minutes which is allowedfor removal or replacement of a bulb during each period. After the tenperiods, the lens reflector unit without the bulb shall be immersed indeionized water for 5 minutes, then secured and allowed to dry by naturalconvection only.(c) Using the voltage, resistance and pretest set up of paragraph (a) thecurrent in each filament circuit shall be measured after the test conductedin paragraph (b).S8.5 <T3>Dust. </T3>The headlamp, mounted on a headlamp test fixture, with alldrain holes, breathing devices or other designed openings in their normaloperating positions, shall be positioned within a cubical box, with insidemeasurements of 35.4 in. (900 mm) on each side or larger if required foradequate wall clearance, i.e., a distance of at least 5.9 in. (150 mm)between the headlamp and any wall of the box. The box shall contain 9.9lb. (4.5 kg) of fine powdered cement which conforms to the ASTM C150-77specification for Portland Cement. Every 15 minutes, the cement shall beagitated by compressed air or fan blower(s) by projecting blasts of airfor a two-second period in a downward direction so that the cement is diffusedas uniformly as possible throughout the entire box. This test shall becontinued for five hours after which the exterior surfaces of the headlampshall be wiped clean.S8.6 <T3>Temperature and internal heat test</T3>_A headlamp with one or morereplaceable standardized light sources shall be tested according to paragraphsS8.6.1 and S8.6.2. Tests shall be made with all filaments lighted at designvoltage that are intended to be used simultaneously in the headlamp andwhich in combination draw the highest total wattage. These include butare not limited to filaments used for turn signal lamps, fog lamps, parkinglamps, and headlamp lower beams lighted with upper beams when the wiringharness is so connected on the vehicle. If a turn signal is included inthe headlamp assembly, it shall be operated at 90 flashes a minute witha 75 andplusmin; 2% current ``on time.'' If the lamp produces both the upperand lower beam, it shall be tested in both the upper beam mode and thelower beam mode under the conditions above described, except for a headlampwith a single HB1 light source.S8.6.1 <T3>Temperature cycle. </T3>A headlamp, mounted on a headlamp test fixture,shall be subjected to 10 complete consecutive cycles having the thermalcycle profile shown in Figure 6. During the hot cycle, the lamp, shallbe energized commencing at point ``A'' of Figure 6 and de-energized atpoint ``B.'' Separate or single test chambers may be used to generate theenvironment of Figure 6. All drain holes, breathing devices or other openingsor vents of the headlamps shall be in their normal operating positions.S8.6.2 <T3>Internal Heat Test. </T3>(a) The headlamp lens surface that would normallybe exposed to road dirt shall be uniformly sprayed with any appropriatemixture of dust and water or other materials to reduce the photometricoutput at the H-V test point of the upper beam (or the \1/2\D-1\1/2\R testpoint of the lower beam as appropriate) to 25 andplusmin; 2% of the outputoriginally measured in the photometric test conducted pursuant to paragraphsS7.4(i), or S7.5 (a) through (e), as applicable. A headlamp with a singleHB1 light source shall be tested on the upper beam only. Such reductionshall be determined under the same conditions as that of the original photometricmeasurement.(b) After the photometric output of the lamp has been reduced as specifiedin paragraph (a), the lamp and its mounting hardware shall be mounted inan environmental chamber in a manner similar to that indicated in Figure7 ``Dirt/Ambient Test Setup.'' The headlamp shall be soaked for one hourat a temperature of 95 + 7 ^0 degrees F (35 + 4 ^0 degrees C) and thenthe lamp shall be energized according to paragraph S8.6 for one hour ina still air condition, allowing the temperature to rise from the soak temperature.(c) The lamp shall be returned to a room ambient temperature of 73 + 7^0 degrees F (23 + 4 ^0 degrees C) and a relative humidity of 30 andplusmin;10% and allowed to stabilize to the room ambient temperature. The lensshall then be cleaned.S8.7 <T3>Humidity. </T3>The headlamp mounted on a headlamp test fixture shallbe placed in a controlled environment consisting of a temperature of 100+ 7 ^0 degrees F (38 + 4 ^0 degrees C) with a relative humidity of notless than 90%. All drain holes, breathing devices, and other designed openingsshall be in their normal operating positions. The headlamp shall be subjectedto 20 consecutive 6-hour test cycles. In each cycle it shall be energizedfor 1 hour at design voltage with the highest combination of filament wattagesthat are intended to be used including a turn signal flashing at 90 flashesper minute with a 75 andplusmin; 2% current ``on time'', if so equipped,and then de-energized for 5 hours. After completion of the last cycle,the lamp shall be soaked for 1 hour at 73 andplusmin; 7 ^0 degrees F (20andplusmin; 4 ^0 degrees C) and relative humidity of 30 andplusmin; 10% beforeit is removed for photometric testing. The headlamp shall be tested forphotometrics at 10 andplusmin; 1 minutes following completion of the humiditytest.S8.8 <T3>Impact. </T3>The headlamp shall be rigidly mounted in a headlamp testfixture on the seating lugs with the mechanical axis (bulb socket axis)vertical, and the lens upward. The seating plane of the test fixture shallconsist of oakwood 0.5 inch (13 mm) thick. One impact shall be deliveredto the center of the lens on the mechanical axis using a steel ball bearingwith a diameter of .9055 in. (23 mm) weighing 1.76 oz. (50 grams), droppedfreely from a distance of 15.75 in. (40 cm) from the bottom of the ballto the surface of the lens, at the intersection of the ball trajectoryand the mechanical axis of the headlamp.S8.9 <T3>Vibration. </T3>A vibration test shall be conducted in accordance withthe procedures of SAE Standard J575e <T3>Tests for Motor Vehicle Lighting Devices and Components </T3>August1970, and the following: the table on the adapter plate shall be of sufficientsize to completely contain the test fixture base with no overhang. Thevibration shall be applied in the vertical axis of the headlamp systemas mounted on the vehicle. The filament shall not be energized.S8.10 <T3>Sealing. </T3>An unfixtured headlamp in its design mounting positionshall be placed in water at a temperature of 176 +/^ 5 degrees F (60 +/^3 degrees C) for one hour. The headlamp shall be energized in its highestwattage mode, with the test voltage at 12.8 +/^ 0.1 V. during immersion.The lamp shall then be de-energized and immediately submerged in its designmounting position into water at 32 +5 ^0 degrees F (0 +3 ^0 degrees C).The water shall be in a pressurized vessel, and the pressure shall be increasedto 10 psi (69 kPa), upon placing the lamp in the water. The lamp shallremain in the pressurized vessel for a period of thirty minutes. This entireprocedure shall be repeated for four cycles. Then the lamp shall be inspectedfor any signs of water on its interior. During the high temperature portionof the cycles, the lamp shall be observed for signs of air escaping fromits interior. If any water occurs on the interior or air escapes, the lampis not a sealed lamp.S9. <T3>Deflection test for standardized replaceable light sources. </T3>With the light source rigidly mounted in a fixture in a manner indicatedin Figure 8, a force 4.0 andplusmin; 0.1 pounds (17.8 andplusmin; 0.4N) isapplied at a distance ``A'' from the reference plane perpendicular to thelongitudinal axis of the glass capsule and parallel to the smallest dimensionof the pressed glass capsule seal. The force shall be applied (using arod with a hard rubber tip with a minimum spherical radius of .039 in (1mm)) radially to the surface of the glass capsule in four locations ina plane parallel to the reference plane and spaced at a distance ``A''from that plane. These force applications shall be spaced 90 degrees apartstarting at the point perpendicular to the smallest dimension of the pressedseal of the glass capsule. The bulb deflection shall be measured at theglass capsule surface at 180 degrees opposite to the force application.S10. <T3>Simultaneous Aim Photometry Tests</T3>(a) <T3>Type F Headlamp Systems. </T3>The assembly shall be located on a goniometerplaced not less than 60 feet (18.3m) from the photometer. The LF unit shallbe aimed mechanically by centering the unit on the photometer axis andby aligning the aiming plane of the lens perpendicular to the photometeraxis. Then the assembly shall be moved in a plane parallel to the establishedaiming plane of the LF headlamp until the UF headlamp is centered on thephotometer axis. Photometry measurements of the UF photometry unit shallbe completed using the aiming plane so established, and the proceduresof section S4.1 and 4.1.4 Standard J1383 APR83, and Figure 15. A reaimtolerance of andplusmin;\1/4\ degree is permitted in any direction at anytest point.(b) <T3>Integral Beam Headlamp Systems. </T3>The assembly used for simultaneouslyaiming more than one integral beam headlamp shall be placed on a test fixtureon a goniometer located not less than 60 feet (18.3 m.) from the photometer.The assembly shall be aimed by centering the geometric center of the lowerbeam lens(es) on the photometer axis and by aligning the photometer axisto be perpendicular to the aiming reference plane or appropriate verticalplane defined by the manufacturer of any lower beam contributor. Photometriccompliance of the lower beam shall be determined with all lower beam contributorsilluminated and in accordance with sections 4.1 and 4.1.6 of SAE StandardJ1383 APR83, and Figure 15. The assembly shall then be moved in a planeparallel to the established aiming plane of the lower beam until the assemblyis located with the geometric center of the upper lens(es) on the photometeraxis. Photometric compliance for upper beam shall now be determined usingthe figure and procedure specified for the lower beam. During photometrictesting, a \1/4\ degree reaim is permitted in any direction at any testpoint.3. The item ``Headlamps'' of Tables I and III are amended by deleting allspecification for number and type under the second column and all referencesto SAE materials under the final column in each Table, and by adding ``SeeS7.'' to the second column.4. The footnotes in Tables I, II, and III, are revised by changing theprefix of each from ``S4'' to ``S5''.5. Footnote 2 in Table IV is changed to read ``S5.1.1.15''.<ITAG tagnum="21">Issued on April 26, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Howard M. Smolkin,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Managing Director.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-10442 Filed 4-27-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-59-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>